Save Page as PDF File
Source : https://webcache.googleusercontent.com/search?strip=1&q=cache:https%3A%2F%2Fwww.tomandmaria.com%2FTom%2FWriting%2FAnnals2006WP.pdf
This is the html version of the file https://www.tomandmaria.com/Tom/Writing/Annals2006WP.pdf. Google automatically generates html versions of documents as we crawl the web.
Tip: To quickly find your search term on this page, press Ctrl+F or ⌘-F (Mac) and use the find bar.
Page 1
Most people first experienced word processing
as an application of the personal computer.
During the 1980s, word processing rivaled and
eventually overtook spreadsheet creation as the
most widespread business application for per-
sonal computers.1 By the end of that decade, the
typewriter had been banished to the corner of
most offices, used only to fill out forms and
address envelopes. By the early 1990s, high-qual-
ity printers and powerful personal computers
were a fixture in middle-class American house-
holds. Email, which emerged as another key
application for personal computers with the
spread of the Internet in the mid-1990s, essen-
tially extended word processing technology to
electronic message transmission. To the casual
observer, word processing might thus appear to
be among the most creative and important appli-
cations originated by the personal computer.
But in fact word processing was already the
center of a thriving industry well before the
personal computer gained general acceptance
in business. Historians have not yet explored
word processing’s development, and so to pro-
vide a rounded treatment, I examine the story
from multiple perspectives. I review the con-
ceptual development of word processing and
office automation; the development of word
processing’s constituent hardware and software
technologies; the relationship of word process-
ing to changes in the organization of office
work; and the business history of the word pro-
cessing industry.
Word processing: Overview
Word processing’s origins are complex and
various: Consider the genesis of the term word
processing. Today, when someone talks about
using a word processor, we think of a software
package, such as Microsoft Word. However, in
the early 1970s, when the idea of word process-
ing first gained prominence, it referred to a new
way of organizing work: an ideal of centralizing
typing and transcription in the hands of spe-
cialists equipped with technologies such as auto-
matic typewriters. The word processing concept
was promoted by IBM to present its typewriter
and dictating machine division as a comple-
ment to its “data processing” business. Within
the word processing center, automatic typewriters
and dictating machines were rechristened word
processing machines, to be operated by word
processing operators rather than secretaries or
stenographers. Quickly, however, the term
acquired a more specialized meaning to refer
almost exclusively to computerized text editing
systems aimed at office applications.
Computerized word processing does not fit
the conventional concept of a distinct inven-
tion, attributable to a particular time, place, and
brilliant mind. The creation of a distinct market
for computerized word processing systems dur-
ing the early 1970s was more a matter of repack-
aging, integrating, and marketing technologies
already devised for different purposes. Word
processing software’s core technical capabilities
were taken from text editors, used to manipu-
late program code on time-sharing computer
systems since the 1960s. Word processing sys-
tems also drew on techniques in a number of
broader, longer established fields in which com-
puters were used to store, retrieve, index, and
format textual information.
During the 1970s, the falling cost of inter-
active computer access made it practical to
apply the same techniques to ordinary admin-
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Published by the IEEE Computer Society
1058-6180/06/$20.00 © 2006 IEEE
Remembering the Office of the Future:
The Origins of Word Processing
and Office Automation
Thomas Haigh
University of Wisconsin
Word processing entered the American office in 1970 as an idea
about reorganizing typists, but its meaning soon shifted to describe
computerized text editing. The designers of word processing systems
combined existing technologies to exploit the falling costs of
interactive computing, creating a new business quite separate from
the emerging world of the personal computer.
istrative work, meaning that word processing’s
invention as a new computer application was
more a matter of marketing than of any software
breakthrough. During the 1970s, the first wide-
ly used computerized word processing systems
were not application programs for general-
purpose personal computers but minicomputer-
based systems and special-purpose computer
packages dedicated to clerical work. By the end
of the 1970s, when someone spoke of purchas-
ing a “word processor,” he or she would have
most likely been referring to a specialized com-
puter system such as Wang Labs’ Word
Processing System. Only later did people begin
to assume that a word processor was a program
rather than a machine.
By the late 1970s, the computer industry was
promoting a new vision—office automation—
of which word processing was just a small part.
The most advanced word processing systems of
the early 1980s, such as the famous-in-retro-
spect Xerox Star, were created not as self-con-
tained applications for stand-alone personal
computers but as office automation systems for
networked workstations. In the paperless office
of the future, a multifunction networked work-
station with word processing, email, and graph-
ical and voice capabilities would sit on the desks
of every manager and every professional.
I argue that office automation represented a
decisive break with the earlier concept of word
processing, based as it was on the segregation
of document preparation in the hands of spe-
cialist clerical workers. However, office automa-
tion ran into technological, economic, and
social problems. Workstations were expensive,
while managers and professionals proved a
more elusive target than typists for office effi-
ciency experts. These systems were not widely
adopted, but the broader vision of the elec-
tronic office they represented was eventually
realized when personal computer hardware and
software matured in the mid-1990s.
Instead of adopting specialist office work-
stations, most companies gradually shifted
from word processing systems to stand-alone
personal computers. These spread word pro-
cessing power more broadly, shifting editing
work from word processing centers into the
hands of department secretaries and, increas-
ingly, of managerial and professional workers.
Far from breaking new technical ground, the
leading personal-computer word processing
programs of the late 1970s and 1980s—such as
EasyWriter, WordStar, and MultiMate—merely
gave an increasingly good imitation of the
more expensive and capable special-purpose
systems. From this perspective, the prolifera-
tion of personal computers in the early 1980s
triggered a 10-year detour away from the net-
worked office model being promoted by the
leading office automation equipment suppliers
of the period. In a pair of articles elsewhere in
this issue, Tim Bergin details the history of per-
sonal computer word processing packages; con-
sequently, my analysis here is confined to a
sketch comparing their abilities with those of
earlier specialized systems.
Invention of word processing
The phrase word processing was nowhere to
be found in 1960s office management or com-
puting literatures, though many of the ideas,
products, and technologies to which it would
later be applied were already well known. By
1972, however, discussion of word processing
was common in publications devoted to office
management and technology, and by the mid-
1970s the term would have been familiar to
any manager who regularly consulted general-
interest business periodicals. Word processing
paralleled the more general data processing,
which since the 1950s had been the standard
term used to describe the application of com-
puters to business administration.2
Coinage of word processing is usually attributed
to Ulrich Steinhilper, a German IBM typewriter
sales executive. In his memoir, Steinhilper wrote
that he devised the concept in the mid-1950s
and promoted it for many years within IBM’s
Office Products Division. He submitted the dia-
gram shown in Figure 1 to IBM’s internal sug-
gestion program, receiving just 25 Deutsch
Marks and a reply that the idea was “too com-
October–December 2006
Figure 1. Steinhilper’s chart, which he claims to
have devised in 1955, reflects his original sense of
word processing as a concept that would put
IBM’s Office Products Division on an equal footing
with its Data Processing Division. (Courtesy of
Ulrich Steinhilper.)
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
plicated to explain.” According to Steinhilper,
the term finally caught on after he used it in a
1966 speech to senior Office Products Division
managers gathered at the Miami meeting of the
Hundred Percent Club of successful IBM sales-
people where he lobbied, unsuccessfully, for
Word Processing as a new name for the entire
Office Products Division. In 1971, once the con-
cept finally gained traction, Steinhilper was
awarded an Outstanding Achievement Award
and a trip around the world for having
authored and promoted it. It had particular
appeal to typewriter salespeople within IBM as a
linguistic means of putting the Office Products
Division (formerly the Electric Typewriter
Division) on a more equal basis with the mighty
Data Processing Division. The word processing
concept cast the two groups as responsible for
different, but equally important-sounding,
kinds of business processing. Steinhilper recalls
that its genesis came when he realized that
We could confidently state that IBM, with its DP
division, assisted in many ways in the processing
of pages containing data, but could we say the
same for the written word? Shouldn’t we now, I
asked, not also follow in the same direction with
the Electric Typewriter Division?3
The first sustained public attempt to pro-
mote the idea of word processing to a broad
American audience came in the minor office
management and office equipment trade pub-
lication Administrative Management. In June
1970 it published a short article on a new word
processing center at Auburn University, which
had been “working closely with the local IBM
representative” to centralize typing and dictat-
ing operations. This may have been the earliest
mention of word processing in the American
press. In December 1970, it ran a feature article
on automatic typing systems that included the
following definition:
“Word processing,” a concept that combines the
dictating and typing functions into a centralized
system, is replacing the one-man, one-secretary,
one-typewriter idea in a growing number of
firms. By organizing the flow of office corre-
spondence on a more efficient basis, word pro-
cessing is becoming to typing what Henry Ford’s
assembly line was to the original methods used
for automobile making.4
Then in June 1971, Administrative Management
devoted a special 32-page section to the new
concept. Administrative Management continued
to heavily promote word processing. It pub-
lished a bimonthly magazine-within-a-maga-
zine devoted to word processing, its publishers
launched a separate twice-monthly newslet-
ter—Word Processing Reports—to spread news of
developments in the field, and its editor, Walter
A. Kleinschrod, published a small book on the
subject in conjunction with the American
Management Association.5 Other publications
rushed to offer their own reports on the new
field, and within a few months, a cluster of
conferences, organizations, and consulting
operations had grown up devoted to word
processing.6 The public’s exposure to the con-
cept of word processing took place almost
simultaneously with the spread of the then-
novel term food processor, a term introduced to
the US in 1973 by Cuisinart to describe a mul-
tifunctional kitchen device able to chop, blend,
and mix.7
But what was word processing? Administrative
Management set the pattern for the next few
years by defining word processing as a general
approach to the reorganization of clerical work
around new and emerging technologies. In its
earliest days, the concept of word processing
did not refer exclusively, or even primarily, to
the use of full-screen video text editing.
Advocates focused on a human rather than a
technological goal. They sought to eliminate
the practice of supplying individual managers
or small work groups with their own “general-
purpose secretaries” responsible for tasks rang-
ing from filing and answering the telephone to
making coffee and sorting the mail. In his
book, Kleinschrod quoted findings that such
women might spend just 2 percent of their
time taking dictation and 19 percent of it typ-
ing and proofing documents. This meant that
“her typing may not necessarily be all that
good,” that “it’s very hard to establish proce-
dures and controls over what she does,” and
that she would spend much of her time sitting
around waiting for something to do.5
The traditional secretary was seen as the
enemy of efficiency. The solution was to move all
typing and dictation work to a centralized word
processing center, where it could be handled by
highly skilled, specialized typists and stenogra-
phers doing nothing but typing and transcrip-
tion all day, using the most advanced equipment
available. Kleinschrod suggested that a word pro-
cessing center might achieve “a speedup from
500 to 1000 percent” provided that “the place is
properly supervised [with] good methods, con-
trols and standards.”8 He recommended
a formalized work-measurement, work standards
program. This involves the familiar techniques
October–December 2006
of task analysis, methods-time measurement,
standard allowed hours—techniques long used
in the factory and in certain clerical areas and
now being expanded to encompass WP.8
The technologies of early word
processing
Although word processing was primarily a
managerial rather than a technological con-
cept, its sudden popularity owed much to a
growing sense in the early 1970s that technol-
ogy was about to transform the office. Because
the new technology was bound to be compli-
cated and expensive, this appeared to support
the idea that clerical work would have to be
specialized and centralized to take full advan-
tage of its potential. Early news stories on word
processing liked to point out that each factory
worker was responsible for an average of
$25,000 worth of equipment, whereas the poor
clerical worker had only $2,000 worth of capi-
talization behind her.9
Thus, the stories
claimed, rising office labor costs reflected a fail-
ure to invest.
An Administrative Management editorial in
January 1970 set the tone: “By the end of the
1970s,” it suggested, “we should have climbed
out of the Gutenberg rut. Paper—memos, letters
and other business forms—will have been
replaced to a large extent by electronic commu-
nications devices.” This bold claim was based on
the potential of dictating machines, calculators,
and microfilm, rather than any clearly articulat-
ed expectations for the use of computers in the
office. However, the author did anticipate com-
puterized word processing with the rather vague
prediction that “[t]ypewriters will continue to
become more automated. They will be hooked
into a growing number of [electronic data pro-
cessing] systems.” 10
Two technologies were particularly associat-
ed with word processing: dictating machines
and automatic typewriters. In its seminal 1971
special issue, Administrative Management includ-
ed feature articles on both. “System Stage 1:
Dictating Machines Sound Off Four Ways”
reviewed developments in dictating technolo-
gy. Technological advancements in dictating
technology meant that desktop (and even
handheld) cassette machines were common by
the early 1970s, but word processing advocates
were particularly excited by the ability of cen-
tralized systems, hooked into telephone switch-
boards, to provide a “continuous flow” of
material from executive desks to busy tran-
scribers. “System Stage II: Automatic Typing
and Text Editing Devices” concerned itself with
automatic typewriters.
This sense of word processing as a broad
approach, including a variety of specific tech-
nologies, typified the early 1970s. IBM liked to
apply the term to as many of its office products
as possible. In the same 1971 Administrative
Management issue, an advertisement (see Figure
2 next page) from IBM’s Office Products Division
suggested that its “range of word processing
machines” included dictating machines, type-
writers, and copiers.11 According to one IBM
document, the next year the Office Products
Division “announced that all of its dictating
equipment would be known as ‘input process-
ing equipment’ since the term better describes
the equipment’s function within the total word
processing concept.”12 A 1974 report noted that
the division was “calling virtually everything it
makes a piece of word processing equipment—
from a dictating machine on up to an office
copier.”13 Although dictating machines gradu-
ally slipped from definitions of word processing,
discussion of word processing equipment con-
tinued to include electronic typewriters and
other devices without large video displays well
into the 1980s.14
Automatic typewriters were already a famil-
iar office technology by the 1970s. They cou-
pled a typewriter mechanism with an automatic
control unit. The technology received its first
widespread use in printing telegraphs, where a
message entered on a keyboard was printed on
a typewriter mechanism hundreds of miles
away. One of the first automatic typewriters
intended for clerical use, the 1917 Hoven
Automatic Typewriter, used a wide tape roll and
a mechanism modeled on a player piano to
type up to 130 words a minute.15 These
machines were useful when preparing letters
that included a mix of standard paragraphs
with individualized elements. Other models
gradually appeared, including the pneumatic
1935 Robotyper.
The 1950s saw widespread use of a more
compact breed of automatic typewriter driven
by six-track paper tapes, such as the Friden
Flexowriter. Although Flexowriters are best
remembered today in their role as I/O devices
for many early computers or as terminals for
corporate communication networks, they could
also be used in a freestanding mode to record
and play back text typed on the keyboard.
In 1964, IBM’s Electric Typewriter Division
introduced the IBM MT/ST or “Magnetic Tape
‘Selectric’ Typewriter”. This machine coupled a
Selectric or “golf-ball” typewriter with a bulky
cabinet holding an electronic control mecha-
nism that recorded keystrokes onto magnetic
tape cassettes. Each tape could store 28,000
characters. One novel feature was the ability to
insert special codes on the tape to mark the
start and end points of standard blocks of text.
The biggest advance, however, came in its abil-
ity to correct simple typing mistakes. When a
mistake was made, the operator would simply
backspace the typewriter and retype the correct
text over the error. This left a mess on the
paper, but after finishing the page the operator
would insert a blank sheet and wait, as the
machine rewound the tape and retyped the
corrected version at the rate of about 175 words
a minute. The operator needed several months’
experience and had to learn many special con-
trol sequences to become fully productive. The
term power typing was often used to describe
this new, more flexible kind of automatic typ-
ing.16 The machines were also sometimes called
editing typewriters.
When the first word processing centers were
established in the early 1970s, most relied on
IBM MT/ST machines. As a text editor, the
MT/ST had some flaws. In particular, it was
hard to edit text once it was recorded on tape,
although this could be overcome by linking
two machines together to copy the document
from one tape to another, up to the point
where editing was required. Things improved
with the MT/ST Mark IV, which merged two
tape drives into a single unit to make editing
easier and to automate mail-merge operations
(one tape would hold the outline of a standard
letter and the other a list of names and other
data to be inserted into personalized copies of
the letter).
Another Selectric, the MC/ST (Magnetic
Card/Selectric Typewriter), introduced in 1969,
used small magnetic cards with a capacity of
5,000 characters. Neither model was particu-
larly cheap—in 1972, the tape version sold for
$7,875 and the card version for $7,150 (though
many customers preferred to rent rather than
buy). A more expensive machine, the MT/SC or
“composer,” could take the MT/ST tape and
output it using proportionally spaced letters
and other then-novel formatting options.
Because the Selectric typewriter mechanism
was widely available, many IBM competitors
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Figure 2. This 1971 IBM advertisement was one of the first to reflect the adoption of the phrase “word processing machines”
by its Office Products Division as a new term for its dictation equipment, automatic typewriters, and copiers. (Courtesy of
IBM Archives.)
used it as the core of their own competitive
automatic typing systems.17
Early word processing in practice
Enthusiasts depicted word processing centers
as good news for operators, who could now
upgrade their typing skills and earn more
money, and for the surviving secretaries, or—as
some thought they should now be called, once
freed from typing and transcription duties—
“administrative support” specialists. Business
Automation, a leading trade magazine for busi-
ness computer users, claimed in 1972 that
[t]he personal relationship of bosses and secre-
taries will be changed through the elimination
of dictation and typing as we know it today.
Secretarial duties will change greatly as tran-
scription of dictation and the production of let-
ters and documents is shunted more and more
into a central word-processing center, freeing the
secretary of much present-day typing drudgery.18
These ideas were common in early discussions
of word processing. The New York Times first
reported on the idea in October 1971, suggesting
that word processing had been the new buzz-
word at the Business Equipment Manufacturer’s
Association trade show. Under a picture of IBM’s
latest automatic typewriter, the Times defined
word processing as “the use of electronic equip-
ment, such as typewriters; procedures, and
trained personnel to maximize office efficiency.”
The paper also suggested that this could be the
“answer to Women’s Lib advocates’ prayers”
because it would eliminate traditional secre-
taries.19 The same month, a Chicago Tribune report
gave a similar definition, opening with the claim
that “Women’s Liberation has hit the technolo-
gy field in the guise of a new theory called ‘word
processing.’” The report, which relied heavily on
quotations from IBM managers, suggested that
“The basic unit of word processing is the IBM
Selectric typewriter, adapted to magnetic tape,”
that “the other mandatory tool” was a centralized
dictating system connected to telephones, and
that putting secretaries into a typing pool not
only boosted productivity but also meant the
women were given higher salaries with “more
responsibility, less pressure.”20
Nothing about the idea of centralizing typ-
ing and dictation was novel, except for the
name—word processing—itself. Advocates of
word processing, such as Administrative
Management magazine and the American
Management Association, were part of a com-
munity we can trace back to the scientific office
management movement of the 1910s and
1920s.21 That movement, in turn, was inspired
by Frederick W. Taylor’s Principles of Scientific
Management.22 The basic idea had changed lit-
tle over 60 years: the office would work most
efficiently when it resembled a factory in which
workers were paid on a piece work or incentive
bonus basis to perform highly specialized and
repetitive tasks, slavishly following the optimal
work procedures designed by experts. Expensive
technology, scientific management adherents
believed, could be justified only when com-
bined with a fundamental redesign of work pro-
cedures to optimize their effectiveness.
Indeed, the prescriptions made by word pro-
cessing experts of the early 1970s were identical
to those made by office management experts of
the 1910s with respect to an early generation of
dictating machines. Both insisted true business
benefits of the new technology would come pri-
marily from work centralization and specializa-
tion that the new machines would demand.
Back in the 1920s, William Henry Leffingwell
(often called the “father of scientific office man-
agement”) had hailed the dictating machine as
an invention with the power to revolutionize
the office. He seized on it to justify the elimina-
tion of shorthand stenography and in-person
dictation, and its replacement with a central-
ized pool of typists who would handle a con-
stant stream of wax recording cylinders
delivered by messenger boys.23 This would cen-
tralize work in the hands of specialists, who
could be monitored and paid on a production
bonus system—exactly the objectives espoused
50 years later by word processing experts.
In reality, the word processing center suf-
fered from many of the same disadvantages as
the centralized dictating pool of a half-centu-
ry before. In response to its first coverage of
the topic, Business Automation published a let-
ter written by a word processor operator from
Evanston, Illinois, identified only as “D.W.”
She complained about her physical condi-
tions: MC/ST machines were noisy and the
word-processor staff spent their entire work-
ing day in cramped conditions looking direct-
ly at a wall. But her bigger complaints were
cultural. She was paid the lowest salary in the
office and cut off from its social life, writing
that “the people in the office regard those of
us who run the machines as part of the
machines rather than as human beings like
themselves!” Early reports claimed that the
shift to word processing reduced employee
turnover, but D.W. disagreed. The work
required people who were good typists, could
spell, and would not become bored—a combi-
nation she found rare. “Word processing
October–December 2006
removes nearly all of the remaining rewards of
secretarial work. ... In the last year two-thirds
of the word processing personnel in my office
have left.” She was particularly prescient in
her suggestion that the new technology would
trigger endless rewrites, dashing hopes for
paper savings.24 IBM’s early attempts to pres-
ent centralized word processing centers as a
breakthrough for feminism do not appear to
have resonated with the women involved,
however successful they initially were in grab-
bing newspaper headlines.25
Computerized word processing:
Technical roots
The original sense of word processing to
mean a centralized pool of typewriter and dic-
tating machine operators to boost clerical pro-
ductivity is now long forgotten. But, as we have
seen, when word processing first gained popu-
larity in 1971, no companies were promoting
computers as general-purpose text editing sys-
tems suitable for routine office work. The devel-
opment of what we would now think of as
word processing technology, the use of com-
puters to manipulate text, has a separate histo-
ry from the concept of word processing. Only
in the mid-1970s did people start to associate
computers with word processing, and by late
1970s this was perhaps the fastest growing and
most fiercely contested segment of the entire
computer industry. This was not the result of
any single conceptual breakthrough or techni-
cal innovation. Rather, computerized word pro-
cessing was the recombination of existing
technological capabilities, prompted by long-
term declines in the cost of computer memory,
disk storage, and processor power and a general
shift toward distributed and interactive systems
based on minicomputer and microprocessor
technologies. Unlike some other breakthroughs
in computer applications, such as the spread-
sheet or relational database, the word proces-
sor was the historically inevitable result of
dozens of minor and largely anonymous
advances in the packaging and application of
existing technologies.
To understand how this occurred, and
where the technologies of computerized word
processing came from, we must step back in
time to explore a parallel history dating to the
computer industry’s early days in the 1950s.
The sudden emergence of computerized word
processing in the office was made possible by a
far more gradual evolution in computerized
text manipulation. From a business viewpoint,
computerized word processing was invented in
the 1970s. From a technology viewpoint, how-
ever, word processing’s various capabilities had
all been demonstrated by the end of the 1950s
(though not all in the same system): displaying
text on a video screen, storing text for easy
retrieval on a tape or disk, printing formatted
text on a printer within established margins,
numbering pages, editing text by inserting or
deleting characters, and applying operations
such as search and replace.
Even in the 1950s, processing letters as well
as numbers was not in the least novel.
Admittedly, the first programmable computers,
such as the Harvard Mark I and the ENIAC,
were designed with numbers rather than letters
in mind. But the nature of the stored-program
digital computer as a general-purpose proces-
sor of encoded symbols meant that storing and
manipulating a string of letters was scarcely dif-
ferent from manipulating and storing a string
of numbers. Getting letters in and out of a com-
puter was not a problem: punched card
machines had added letters to their repertoire
in the 1930s, and teletype machines could also
handle textual input and store messages on
paper tape.
Early systems followed the lead of teletype
machines in using just 6 bits of memory to
store each character, restricting systems to
uppercase letters and a handful of punctuation
characters.26
By the 1960s, however, the
EBCDIC coding scheme created by IBM for its
System 360 machines and the ASCII standard
favored by much of the rest of the industry
gave computer equipment an easy way to han-
dle the full range of English characters in both
upper- and lowercase and a full range of punc-
tuation marks.27
Computers thus had no absolute technical
barriers preventing them from reading, analyz-
ing, and printing text. However, this capabili-
ty was never applied to general-purpose office
work. It then seemed no more sensible to use a
computer to edit than to travel to the shopping
mall in a supersonic fighter jet. Only the plum-
meting cost of interactive computing could
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
What we would now think
of as word processing
technology has a separate
history from the concept of
word processing.
turn an absurd luxury into an expensive tool
with economic justifications in specialized
fields, and eventually into an inexpensive office
commonplace. The business data-processing
applications of the 1950s and 1960s squeezed
textual information into rigidly defined and
rather short fields such as “title” or “last name,”
each corresponding to particular groups of
columns on the punched input card. These
would show up in the appropriate places on
paychecks, invoices, and printed reports. This
parsimony in text handling and storage is hard-
ly surprising. Computer time was expensive,
and space on disk drives and magnetic drums
was limited.
Early text processing
Some specialized text processing applica-
tions did develop during the 1950s and 1960s,
generally where one or both of the following
conditions were met. First, the application
involved much analysis and manipulation of
the encoded text, rather than simply storing or
editing it. Second, those involved had access
either to a vast amount of money or to com-
puter facilities they were not required to pay for.
A key feature of word processing systems,
the automatic manipulation of text (literally,
the processing of words), was pioneered in
other systems early in the history of digital
computing. During the early 1950s, the
machine translation of natural languages was
viewed as a promising area of research. This, of
course, involved storing, processing, and print-
ing documents, although as a necessary pre-
liminary step rather than an end in itself. In
1954, IBM demonstrated a working, if highly
limited, system able to translate a small num-
ber of technical phrases.28 Although further
progress was disappointing, this was the first
widely publicized application of the computer
to natural-language text processing. Also dur-
ing the 1950s, the widespread adoption of
assemblers and, from 1957, of high-level lan-
guages such as Fortran made the automatic
parsing of computer languages a more success-
ful kind of text processing.29
One of the best-known early applications of
text processing was the analysis of literary texts.
From the 1950s on, computers were used to
cross-reference the occurrences of phrases with-
in texts and to develop numerical descriptions
of the prose styles associated with particular
authors, shedding new light on long-running
disputes over biblical and Shakespearean texts.
Specialized “string processing” programming
languages, most notably Snobol variants,
emerged to aid textual applications.30 Word
processing capabilities such as search and
replace, and even indexing, were just special-
ized applications of these techniques.
Computerized word processing systems
made it possible to store entire documents on
disk and retrieve them as needed. Again, this
capability was not novel, but had previously
been too expensive to apply to office corre-
spondence. Information retrieval grew as a
research area alongside the computer’s spread
during the 1950s and 1960s. While the term
was also applied to systems based on punched
cards, microfilm, and other technologies, by
the late 1960s a number of online computer
systems were being created to manage large
volumes of text for corporations or govern-
ment agencies with significant money to
spend. These systems, used interactively
through teletype terminals, were usually
restricted to the retrieval of abstracts or cita-
tions based on user-provided keywords. Among
the best known were the Dialog system (created
for NASA by Lockheed) and the Orbit system
produced by the System Development
Corporation (SDC).
Time-sharing services made it possible to sell
remote access to text retrieval systems. The
Lexis database, launched commercially in
1973, offered full-text retrieval from a collec-
tion of more than two billion characters of
legal and tax rulings. This service targeted two
of the few groups able to support the huge costs
involved: lawyers and tax professionals. A min-
imum subscription of $2,500 a month in 1974
helped make Lexis the first major commercial
success in online text storage and retrieval.31
Enter the text editor
The direct technological ancestor of the
word processing program was the text editor.
In contrast to high-margin applications like
Lexis, simply storing and editing ordinary doc-
uments such as letters and manuals showed lit-
tle commercial value as an application for
expensive computer time. Nevertheless, text
editing applications seemed to surface with
some rapidity whenever creative programmers
were given unrestricted interactive access to a
computer. The reason for this is straightfor-
ward: programmers write programs, program
source files are text, and—given the chance—
most programmers would rather use a terminal
to enter the code directly into the system rather
than wait for it to be punched onto a paper
card for batch input. Eventually, interactive-
computing costs dropped sufficiently to make
interactive editing of the kind pioneered by
programmers feasible for office work.
October–December 2006
The core functions of a text editor are iden-
tical to those of a word processor: text must be
entered, manipulated, saved, and processed.
Text editors are not simply precursors to word
processors but an earlier and continuing appli-
cation of the same technologies for a different
purpose. By the early 1970s, the most advanced
text editors offered interactive full-screen video
editing of text, search and replace, edit files too
large to fit in the computer’s available core
memory, and most of the other key features of
later word processing software.
The main difference between the two in
terms of core functionality is that word proces-
sors usually add greater control over the for-
matting of printed output because their output
is intended for humans rather than computers.
But the key distinction is more cultural than
technical: text editors are used by programmers
to write programs and edit system files; word
processors are used by everyone else to do
everything else.
Among the first programmers free to experi-
ment with online text editing were the young
computer enthusiasts of Massachusetts Institute
of Technology, memorably chronicled by Steven
Levy in Hackers.32 In the early 1960s, they found
themselves in the almost unique position of
having direct use of a reasonably powerful com-
puter, the first production model of the DEC
(Digital Equipment Corporation) PDP-1, with-
out having to worry about paying for or justify-
ing their time on it. Among the many novel or
quirky programs they created was Expensive
Typewriter, written by Steve Piner. It made seem-
ingly profligate use of the computer to achieve
basic text-editing capabilities and ease prepara-
tion of programs stored on paper tape.33 MIT
computer scientist John McCarthy wrote anoth-
er editor, Colossal Typewriter, for the same
machine. Another program, TJ-2, could format
a text file to fit a page with margins and justifi-
cation, sending output either to a tape or direct-
ly to a teletype. Although it did not allow
onscreen text editing, it did use the PDP-1’s vec-
tor screen to display candidate words for auto-
matic hyphenation, which the user could
manipulate with a light pen.34
Few computer users of the 1960s could hope
to tie up a whole computer while they edited a
program. However, time-sharing operating sys-
tems lowered the cost of interactive computing
and thus spread online text editing somewhat
more widely. These allowed several users to
simultaneously access a single computer, each
using a teletype unit to control the computer
and run programs. Time-sharing systems
became increasingly popular in computing
research centers during the mid-1960s. Most
systems let programmers enter and edit source
code using a teletype unit. This code was saved,
at least temporarily, on a disk or drum for input
directly into a compiler or assembler. This
meant that any useful time-sharing system
required a text editor, and each major time-
sharing research group appears to have pro-
duced more than one.
A memo MIT’s John McCarthy had written in
1959, proposing the construction of the first
time-sharing system, identified compelling
advantages of the new approach: interactive
debugging and the abilities to “write the pro-
gram in source language directly into the com-
puter” and to “check out a program directly after
writing it.”35 In 1962, the first published paper to
describe a working time-sharing system includ-
ed discussion of its text editing abilities.36 The
finished version of this system, the Compatible
Timesharing System for the IBM 7094, included
both Typset, an editor, and Runoff, a program to
output and justify text files. At SDC in Santa
Monica, California, another center of time-shar-
ing innovation during the early 1960s, pro-
grammers created an editor called Edtext.
Online text editing spread beyond the labo-
ratory, along with time-sharing. QED, among
the most influential of the early text editors,
was developed during the mid-1960s by Butler
Lampson and Peter Deutsch for the SDS 940
computer at the University of California,
Berkeley.37 Like other editors of the period, it
was designed for use with teletype systems rather
than video displays, meaning that each line in
the document was numbered, and users typed
commands to print, delete, move, or edit parts
of the document. To edit a file, the user would
select a particular line and then specify the
required changes. QED boasted some impressive
features including search and replace, multiple
buffers between which text could be copied (giv-
ing capabilities similar to those we think of today
as cut and paste), and the ability to label blocks
of text for easy reference. QED spread widely, in
part because Berkeley’s system provided the fun-
damental technology for two of the earliest com-
mercial timesharing services, Comshare and
Tymshare. Tymshare, for example, used an
improved version of QED called Editor.
When we think of a word processor now, we
tend to assume that it includes a video screen
showing many lines of text, around which the
user can move a cursor to insert or edit materi-
al. Like interactive text editing in general, inter-
active text editing on video screens was applied
to the editing of computer source code some
years before it was widely used for office work.
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Page 10
With the spread of more powerful video screen
terminals during the 1970s, editors acquired
full screen or screen oriented capabilities. This
meant that users could move the cursor to any
line on the screen and edit, insert, or replace
the text already there.
The editors discussed earlier were all line edi-
tors, designed to work with teletype systems.
These could be used with any kind of terminal,
and so remained a standard part of every oper-
ating system.38
The most celebrated video screen text editor
of all, Emacs, originated at MIT as an extension
of the institute’s earlier TECO (Tape Editor and
COrrector) editor, first developed circa 1963 for
the PDP-1 by Daniel L. Murphy as a replace-
ment for Piner’s Expensive Typewriter. Using
TECO to edit involved writing short programs
in an exceptionally terse programming lan-
guage to perform operations such as search and
replace. This appealed to programmers, the pri-
mary users of text editors. Many versions were
produced, and TECO evolved more as a pro-
gramming platform and language for the cre-
ation of editors rather than as an editor.
Emacs, which stood for editing macros,
began as a standardized collection of TECO
macros for full-screen editing created in the
mid-1970s by Richard Stallman of MIT’s artifi-
cial intelligence lab.39 Though Emacs evolved
into a freestanding editor, this heritage meant
that it included its own programming language
(a version of Lisp) and users could extend or
customize it. Over time, Emacs acquired a wide
range of extensions to do, for example, syntax
checking and automatic code indenting, and
more unusual things such as playing games
and browsing Internet newsgroups.
Text formatting system
Meanwhile, computer systems were also
making strides in the output of formatted text.
Around 1967, Ken Thompson and Dennis
Ritchie at Bell Labs produced new implementa-
tions of QED, including the specification of
elaborate rules for search-and-replace opera-
tions.40 A few years later, the same team created
the Unix operating system on a small, almost
obsolete PDP-7 system. Unix developed a sys-
tem tool philosophy in which powerful but spe-
cialized software tools could be interconnected
by linking their input and output text streams
together via an innovation known as a pipe.
The operating system kernel did little, but it was
accompanied by powerful and portable tools.
Unix tools, most notably roff and its successors
nroff and troff, took textual input and format-
ted it for printed output. In fact, the first useful
application of Unix was the formatting of
patent documents. Unix tools were used in Bell
Labs to produce large technical manuals direct-
ly on phototypesetting hardware, and soon
found a broader audience. A 1981 survey called
the troff/nroff combination “probably the most
widely used text formatters in the world.”41
Text formatting systems based on embedded
control codes were widely used in the publish-
ing industry, continuing practices established
with earlier typesetting hardware. Tools like
this provided similar output to later word pro-
cessing software, but followed the earlier pat-
tern in which separate application programs
handled the text editing and the formatted
document output. The ultimate expression of
this stream of development is Donald Knuth’s
TeX document description language, created
during the 1970s and 1980s.42 TeX proliferated
among computer scientists and mathemati-
cians, who continue to love its programmabil-
ity, its elegant and precise control over the
formatting of output, and its masterful han-
dling of equations. Most administrative users,
however, showed little interest in a system that
essentially required them to write their docu-
ment as a kind of computer program and then
compile it to view the output.
The users and creators of systems such as
Unix, Emacs, and TeX systems differed notably
from those of word processing systems, and
viewed their tasks differently. Their creators
often viewed textual manipulation (including
editing and formatting) as a problem to be
solved through the creation of flexible and pro-
grammable system building tools. Some aspects
of their work, particularly advanced search-
and-replace capabilities, eventually made their
way into word processing, but despite techni-
cal similarities to word processing systems,
these text editing tools were never designed for
the general-office population.
Computerized word processing
Having surveyed the origins of computer-
ized word processing technologies, let’s return
to the office of the 1970s to see how and why
they were first applied to office work to create
what we would now think of as the word
processor. Text editing software reached the
office through several distinct waves of com-
puter technology: commercial time-sharing
systems from the late 1960s onward, minicom-
puters from the early 1970s onward, and spe-
cialized word processing computer systems
from the mid-1970s onward. Of these, the spe-
cialized computer systems were by far the most
important in establishing a market for com-
October–December 2006
Page 11
puterized text editing. Over the 1970s, word
processing centers increasingly adopted com-
puterized word processing systems produced by
firms such as IBM, Wang Laboratories, and
Vydec to replace automatic typewriters like
IBM’s MT/ST. In this way, the original concept
of word processing as the centralization of typ-
ing and dictation work around new technolo-
gies gradually merged with what we now
consider word processing technologies.
At end of the 1960s, commercial time-sharing
services gave businesspeople outside corporate
data processing departments their first real
chance to work interactively with computers.
In principle, this opened up online text editing
tools to a broad audience, though the combi-
nation of the high hourly rates charged by
time-sharing services and the slow teletype
machines used by most people to access them
meant that this was not a particularly compelling
application. This did not stop Administrative
Management from promoting the idea in a 1970
article (shortly before it discovered the concept
of word processing), when it suggested that
automated text processing [was] a recently devel-
oped office application for time sharing. …
Revisions and editing are quickly and easily
accomplished without having to retype the
entire document.43
At least some people in the business tech-
nology community believed that document
editing was likely to become an important
application of computer systems once inexpen-
sive and convenient computer access was com-
monplace. One firm, Browne Time Sharing Inc.,
specialized in online text editing and process-
ing services.44 Browne launched its service in
1969, using an IBM 370 mainframe connected
to dial-in telephone lines, and marketed to users
needing to make frequent revisions to long doc-
uments. Its main business was as a financial
printer, and it provided its clients with high-
quality printed copies of their remotely edited
documents by overnight delivery.45
The spread of affordable and increasingly
powerful minicomputer systems during the late
1960s and early 1970s broadened access to
interactive systems. Beyond disseminating
interactive text editing for programming pur-
poses, this situation also made it practical to
consider minicomputers’ application to docu-
ment preparation, and appears to have hap-
pened first in technologically oriented firms
and among those using computers to drive
high-quality output systems.
Typesetting machines had been using paper
tapes as input for decades. Some major publish-
ers and newspapers had been using computers
to prepare tapes for typesetting systems since
the 1960s, and interest was growing in photo-
typesetting systems in which lines of text were
generated optically under computer control.46
Advances in printing technology, combined
with the relative affordability of minicomput-
ers, made text editing and computer-controlled
phototypesetting viable for a much broader
range of publications.47
But with different programming, a minicom-
puter could work much like an automatic type-
writer, such as IBM’s popular MT/ST. This opened
a potentially huge market since, unlike larger
computers, minicomputers could be sold direct-
ly to small companies or to small departments
within larger companies. Business Automation
profiled a Boston law firm that replaced its three
MT/ST-typewriter-based systems with a DEC PDP
8/E minicomputer in 1970. Although Selectric
typewriters were used for editing and input, out-
put of large documents was much faster thanks
to a high-speed printer. The new system had sev-
eral advantages. Because it was interactive, it
could warn when errors were made and prompt
the user for input, making it much easier to learn
than the MT/ST. And because it used disk rather
than tape cartridges to store documents and
standard paragraphs, a much larger library of
standard paragraphs could be maintained and
accessed with greater ease. The firm later added
a second disk drive and a video terminal, allow-
ing onscreen editing of documents. Of course,
the minicomputer had the additional advan-
tage that it could run software to perform other
tasks such as accounting.48
Law firms were the most enthusiastic
adopters of such systems. Their work centered
on the regular production of long, intricate
technical documents incorporating standard
elements. This had to be done quickly and
accurately. The expensive and novel technolo-
gy of word processing could pay its way more
easily here than in almost any other environ-
ment. Lawyers charged high hourly rates, and
legal secretaries and paralegals were much bet-
ter paid than typical office staff. For such firms,
word processing was what would later be called
a killer application—a piece of software so com-
pelling that it justified the purchase of a com-
plete minicomputer system merely to run it. By
1982, more than two-thirds of law firms had
installed word processing systems.49
Special-purpose word processing systems
Minicomputer-based systems soon faced
stiff competition from the new market for
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Page 12
video-based specialized word processing hard-
ware.50 Lexitron, a start-up firm, offered the first
stand-alone word processor with a video screen
in 1972. The document being edited was held
in memory and displayed on the screen, then
saved to magnetic tape or printed at the end of
the session.51 Linolex, a creator of video termi-
nals and keyboards, added word processing
capabilities to its terminal technology to create
specialized systems. However, it was Vydec, a
small start-up firm founded by a former
Hewlett-Packard engineering team, that creat-
ed the template for stand-alone, video-screen-
based word processors. Its product, launched in
1973, was the first to display a full page (up to
66 lines) of text on the screen and included
floppy disk drives and a daisywheel printer.
Though expensive, at $18,000, the machines
established the existence of a niche market in
which Vydec initially faced little competition.52
All of these machines sold slowly at first, as the
start-ups focused their limited resources on
organizations with heavy editing needs, such
as federal government agencies. According to a
March 1975 report, Vydec had installed almost
300 video word processing systems, Lexitron
1,000, and Linolex almost 700.53
While the original Vydec system was some-
thing of an engineering feat, the technologies
needed to duplicate its capabilities became
widely available over the next few years. By the
mid-1970s, many firms had the expertise to
design a word processor system by assembling
a number of off-the-shelf components. Word
processors were sold by many companies,
including Redactron, Dictaphone, Lanier, CPT,
NBI (Nothing But Initials), and Addressograph-
Multigraph. The hardware, essentially the same
used to produce a personal computer, was sim-
ilar to that needed to create a video terminal,
but it was bundled into a different product. The
most obvious of the new components, the
microprocessor, shrank the central processor
unit of a simple computer to fit on a single chip.
The original Vydec model did not use a
microprocessor, but in 1975 another start-up,
NBI, produced a microprocessor-based word
processor and other manufacturers were quick
to follow. Expensive hand-woven magnetic core
memory, the standard memory technology of
the 1950s and 1960s, was quickly replaced in
smaller computers with DRAM (dynamic RAM)
chips, first sold commercially by Intel in 1970.
This dramatically lowered the cost of a memory
unit able to store a few pages of text for editing.
Another key technology was the floppy disk.
Floppy disk drives were first sold in 1971 to
store microcode for IBM mainframes. Within a
few years, eight-inch floppy drives and disks
were readily available from several manufac-
turers. Their main application was as a versa-
tile, inexpensive replacement for punched
cards and paper tape, becoming the standard
medium for information storage and exchange
on less-powerful computer systems. The flop-
pies had significant advantages for word pro-
cessing over the IBM MT/ST and MT/SC
magnetic tapes and cards. Likewise, the falling
costs and rising capabilities of video displays
meant that a screen able to display a full page
of text was no longer prohibitively expensive.
The word processing software was stored on
disks, and would run automatically when the
machine was turned on.
Just as important, though less celebrated,
was the daisywheel printer. Previously, com-
puters had been coupled with adapted type-
writer mechanisms such as the Flexowriter or
IBM Selectric for slow, high-quality output and
with large, expensive “line printers” to produce
high-speed output on continuous paper.
Daisywheel printers gave typewriter-quality
output at several times the speed of a Selectric
and with greater reliability under heavy loads.
In 1972, Diablo (later acquired by Xerox)
launched the first daisywheel printer. It faced
stiff competition from Qume, a rival firm
begun by the technology’s original inventor.54
Word processing systems usually incorporated
a printing mechanism built by one of those
two firms.
Word processing market matures
The small, specialized firms that pioneered
the market faced growing competition over the
next few years, most notably from Wang
Laboratories. Wang had been selling specialized
electronic devices, such as desk calculators and
control equipment, since the 1950s. Its 1971
model 1200, like IBM’s MC/ST, was a typewriter
controlled by magnetic tape. Although not par-
ticularly ambitious technically—its control unit
is said to have been adapted from that of a desk
calculator—this earned Wang a foothold in the
market.55 Wang had been selling computers
October–December 2006
By the mid-1970s, many
firms had the expertise to
design a word processor
system.
Page 13
since the 1960s, and in the late 1970s its com-
puter and word processing product lines began
to converge. In 1975, Wang launched the
Wang Computer System (WCS) range, consist-
ing of three models: the 10, 20, and 30.55,56 The
systems were integrated into custom-built
desks, and were aimed at technical applications
and small business administration.
Wang took a similar approach to selling its
Word Processor System, launched in 1976. The
Wang Word Processor range likewise included
three models coded 10, 20, and 30. The screens
and cases of the workstations used on this
range closely resembled those of the WCS
machines, though internally they used Intel
8080 microprocessors rather than the custom
logic of Wang’s earlier computers.57 The model
10 was a stand-alone model with a daisywheel
printer and single floppy disk drive, used to
load the bundled word processing software and
to hold documents. The model 20 supported
up to three workstations and their three print-
ers, networked via a proprietary coaxial system
to a single “storage station” with twin floppy
drives. Editing of one document could contin-
ue while another printed in the background.
The model 30 built a hard disk drive into a cus-
tomized desk and supported up to 14 worksta-
tions and printers.58
Although Wang’s stand-alone model 10 was
competitive with existing products such as the
Vydec systems, it was models 20 and 30 that
made Wang synonymous with high-end word
processing systems. These machines created a
new class of “clustered” word processing sys-
tems. It was many years before standard per-
sonal computers could share files with
comparable ease and effectiveness. From the
user’s viewpoint, these systems provided capa-
bilities similar to those based on multiple ter-
minals connected to a minicomputer, referred
to, in that era, as shared logic systems.
Wang was renowned for the quality of its
support and documentation, and like its earlier
calculator systems, its word processing systems
were designed to be used by small-business peo-
ple rather than technical specialists. They were
easy to set up, and relied on menus rather than
the command languages common among other
text editing and formatting systems of the era.
Harold Koplow, leader of the design team,
began by writing the user manual for the sys-
tem with his colleague Dave Moros, refining it
until it described a system he believed a secre-
tary could use with minimal training.59 Only
then did programming and design begin—
although Koplow later claimed this strategy
was not so much the result of a user-centered
design philosophy as the unavoidable result of
his having been deprived of resources after
falling from favor with the firm’s autocratic
founder.60 The Wang system of menus and
prompts was indeed easy to learn, though some
complained that expert users remained hob-
bled by the designers’ assumption that secre-
taries required a highly structured interface.
Lanier Business Systems, which overtook
IBM and Dictaphone in the market for dictat-
ing systems during the mid-1970s, also estab-
lished itself as the leading supplier of
stand-alone video-based word processing sys-
tems. Its “No Problem” word processor, intro-
duced in 1977, was promoted as easy to use
and, as the name suggests, with a certain folksi-
ness.61 This must have worked, because by 1978
it was outselling all its competitors with about
one-fifth share of this fragmented market seg-
ment.62 (Lanier later stumbled when it applied
a similar approach to the computer market with
its Computereze product line and by 1982 had
lost its lead in stand-alone word processors).63
In contrast, IBM was slow to compete effec-
tively in the market for video-screen-based
word processors, something contemporary
observers tended to attribute to internal poli-
tics, and in particular to a reluctance to under-
mine its lucrative MT/ST automatic typewriter
business. In 1976, IBM held an estimated 80
percent of the word processing market, based
almost entirely on the monthly leased pay-
ments it received for around 150,000 magnet-
ic-card- and –tape-based Selectric systems.64
IBM gradually enhanced these machines,
offering several new models based on mag-
netic cards and revamping its product line to
add small electronic memories able to store
8,000 characters for instant retrieval.65 IBM
also added communications functions to its
machines, allowing them to transmit text to
its computers. Its MT/ST machines were repo-
sitioned as companions for newer models
such as ill-fated System 6, launched in 1976,
which offered an expensive high-speed inkjet
printer, floppy disk storage, and communica-
tion capabilities, but only an inadequate six-
line video display.64
IBM’s dominance eroded fast over the next
few years, though by the end of 1979 it was still
estimated to hold around 60 percent of the
overall word processing market.66 Only in 1980
did it finally offer a credible modern word
processor with the Displaywriter word process-
ing system, which used floppy disks to store
documents and load programs and, as its name
suggested, included a video screen for editing.67
In response, Wang launched the relatively
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Page 14
affordable stand-alone Wangwriter, which sold
to corporate customers for around $7,000.68
Computerized word processing in practice
Although the cost of word processing sys-
tems fell somewhat by the end of the 1970s,
the systems remained too expensive for most
companies to use as general replacements for
typewriters. Instead, they remained fixtures of
centralized word processing centers. This push
to centralize typing and dictation work did not
work well for all companies, even when man-
dated by senior managers. One consultant
reported on an organization where “all of the
typewriters were removed from the floors
between a Friday and a Monday to make sure
that everyone would have to use the new pro-
cessing center.”69 The results were disappoint-
ing for many companies, especially where the
work involved was complex and nonroutine.
By 1975, this insistence on the rigid central-
ization of clerical work had already inspired
something of a backlash. IBM’s competitors
publicized its difficulties, and Business Week
quoted a vice president of IBM’s office products
group as admitting that the company had
pushed the idea onto firms for which it might
not be appropriate. IBM, he explained, now
recognized the need to let some secretaries keep
their typewriters and to allow specialist groups
to establish their own word processing opera-
tions.70 However, the high cost of dedicated
word processing systems made it hard for
organizations to justify the costs involved in
equipping personal secretaries with them.
Centralized word processing operations con-
tinued to be the norm.
As a result, typewriters proved quite resilient.
By 1980, traditional automatic typewriters such
as the MT/ST were no longer attractive alterna-
tives to computer-based word processing sys-
tems for customers able to spend $10,000 or
more for each workstation. But the overall mar-
ket for automatic typewriters continued to
grow well into the 1980s. New firms such as
Qyx and established typewriter companies like
Olivetti and Smith-Corona competed in this
market. The plummeting cost of microproces-
sors and memory chips made it easy for design-
ers to include features such as a built-in
memory able to store the last few pages typed.
Editing capabilities were shrunk into a chip
inside the typewriter itself, rather than a bulky
external controller. At the time, the market for
these machines, often called electronic typewrit-
ers, was perceived as the fastest growing and (in
terms of unit sales) potentially the largest seg-
ment of the overall word processing market.71
By the mid-1980s, many typewriters included
single-line displays for easy correction and fea-
tures such as spell-checking and tape or disk
storage. Despite the increasing affordability of
personal computers, electronic typewriter sales
continued to grow until at least 1988.72
From word processing to office
automation
By the end of the 1970s, word processing was
increasingly seen as merely part of a broader
goal: office automation. The office automation
concept had gained currency in 1975, when
Infosystems published an article titled “Here
Comes the Automated Office” and Business Week
ran a feature on “The Office of the Future,”
which proclaimed that “in almost a matter of
months, office automation has emerged as a
full-blown systems approach that will revolu-
tionize how offices work,” at least according to
“office equipment makers and the research com-
munity.”73 Using slogans such as “the office of
the future” and “the paperless office,” a host of
computer companies from industry stalwart
IBM to upstarts like DEC and specialists like
Wang served up virtually identical visions of a
future in which clerical workers, professionals,
and managers performed their daily work on
networks of interconnected terminals. For com-
puting suppliers, technology analysts, and data
processing managers, office automation seemed
a way to finally realize a goal that had been a
cliché among computer enthusiasts for decades:
a computer terminal on every executive’s desk.
Indeed, office automation, rather than the
personal computer, was the highest profile and
most hyped development innovation of corpo-
rate computing during the second half of the
1970s and the first few years of the 1980s. Like
the late 1950s and late 1990s, this was a period
in which enormous publicity was given to the
idea that computers were about to revolution-
ize business operations. Newspapers and busi-
ness magazines were awash with discussion of
new, or newly popular, buzzwords such as the
microelectronic revolution, the information
society, the chief information officer, informa-
tion technology, the postindustrial society, and
knowledge workers. The wave of enthusiasm for
office automation reflected this broader faith in
the transformative power of the computer and
its application to ever broader areas of society.
Decades earlier, the office automation con-
cept had enjoyed a brief vogue in business
computing’s early days. From 1954 onward,
computers were successfully applied to cleri-
cal tasks in thousands of companies, though
not always as economically or straightfor-
October–December 2006
Page 15
wardly as expected. During this period, the
term office automation enjoyed brief use, only
to vanish again until the 1970s.74 This disap-
pearance may have been triggered by the real-
ization that computerization served not so
much to automate the office as to physically
and culturally remove various tasks from the
office altogether.75 Data to be processed by the
computer was written onto special forms, to
be punched onto cards in a remote and inac-
cessible data processing center. Voluminous
piles of printout eventually made their way
back to the office.
Inside the typical office of 1970, little would
have shocked a time traveler from a half-cen-
tury earlier. Documents were still typed, carbon
copies still made for reference, messages still
transmitted on paper through internal or exter-
nal mail systems, telephones still used for
instant communication, and documents still
filed in hanging folders placed in vertical filing
cabinets. Changes had occurred, but these were
not overly disruptive: mimeograph machines
and photographic copying techniques were
supplemented by Xerox copiers, electric type-
writers became common, calculating machines
were now electronic (if still bulky and expen-
sive), and correction fluid made it somewhat
easier to remedy typing mistakes.
As originally conceived in the early 1970s,
word processing was to continue this trend of
work physically removed from the office, to be
carried out in a remote center by specialists
using expensive equipment. Just as data pro-
cessing had removed activities such as cus-
tomer billing, payroll calculation, and stock
control from the office and transferred them to
specialized equipment in a remote center, so
word processing would remove typing and dic-
tation from the office and handle them remote-
ly with specialized equipment.
The return of the phrase office automation
coincided with the realization that new tech-
nologies made it possible to automate ever
more work but retain control over its execution
in the office rather than shipping it out to a
data processing center. This was not a result of
the personal computer. The business comput-
ing experts of the early 1970s were certainly
aware of the power of the microprocessor, and
its ability to make inexpensive interactive video
terminals a reality. But throughout the 1970s,
corporate computing staff paid much more
attention to the potential of microelectronics
in specialized office automation technology
than to early personal computers, which
seemed ludicrously clunky and underpowered
for business use. In the corporate context, office
automation was largely a return to an older
dream of a computerized, “totally integrated
management information system” in which
new and more efficient administrative proce-
dures were designed by experts as part of an
integrated and optimized system covering the
whole business.76 One expert made this explic-
it, suggesting that “word processing has the
potential of leading us to the management
information system that EDP [the Electronic
Data Processing industry] has talked about for
10 years or more and never delivered on.”77
This shift in the business computing litera-
ture from word processing to office automation
represented a change on several levels. On the
technical level, it was a shift from independent
word processing machines or small clustered
systems toward networked systems offering
shared file storage, electronic mail, and access
to larger computer systems. In terms of organi-
zational politics, it was a shift of authority away
from the office manager (responsible for cleri-
cal workers) and toward the data processing
manager (responsible for computers). On the
conceptual level, it represented a shift away
from the idea that investments in technology
should be justified by lowering clerical labor
costs to an assumption that computers should
be used directly by professionals and managers
to make them more productive.
Early research in office automation
Academic and corporate researchers had
been exploring the application of computers
to managerial and professional work for some
time. Doug Engelbart was perhaps the first per-
son to publicly demonstrate the application of
text editing technology to everyday manageri-
al tasks. He sought a method of “augmenting
human intelligence” through a partnership of
human and machine, with the idea that the
computer should be one’s constant partner
through the workday. Engelbart, an idiosyn-
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
The shift in the business
computing literature
from word processing to
office automation
represented a change on
several levels.
Page 16
cratic researcher at the Stanford Research
Institute, is well known as the leader of the
team that produced NLS (Online System), the
first operating system to use windows or
mice.78 In 1968, he famously used a Joint
Computer Conference to demonstrate the vir-
tuosity of NLS to a shocked community of
computer science researchers. The demonstra-
tion included several minutes’ presentation of
the system’s ability to deal with a request from
his wife to “do a little shopping on the way
home” by creating and organizing a lengthy
shopping list.79
NLS included many text editing capabilities
of later word processors, including word wrap,
search and replace, and scrolling, and the use
of a mouse to select text to be cut and pasted
between documents. Indeed, Engelbart’s sys-
tem was much more complex than most sub-
sequent word processing systems, and was
concerned with a document’s underlying struc-
ture and with processes of group collaboration.
NLS treated documents as a hierarchy of ele-
ments, enabling the user to expand or hide parts
of a document outline, automatically number
items, send electronic messages to other users,
create hypertext links between documents, work
collaboratively on document editing, and
include graphics in documents. However, its
user interface was complex and cryptic, and the
system was never commercialized. NLS offered
enormous power to those willing to commit
themselves to its mastery but could never be
grasped by the more casual user, despite
Engelbart’s conviction that it should become a
universal companion to the human mind.
It took the office products company Xerox
to reinterpret Engelbart’s ideas in a fashion
accessible to ordinary people. During the early
and mid-1970s, Xerox researchers created the
personal workstation concept, along with the
graphical user interface (windows, icons, and
pull-down menus), Ethernet, and laser printer.
Many of its staff members were veterans of
Engelbart’s research group, and the researchers
followed a similar practice of creating fully
developed systems for their own daily use. The
story of how Xerox’s PARC pioneered many of
the key hardware and software technologies of
today’s computers is perhaps the most celebrat-
ed tale in the history of the personal computer.
Yet the connection between PARC’s accom-
plishments and the mid-1970s enthusiasm for
office automation is often overlooked. It’s true
that PARC’s key researchers were computer sci-
entists, rather than experts on office work. But
Xerox’s interest in funding the lab stemmed
from the general sense that computerization
was about to reinvent the office, rather than a
philanthropic desire to advance knowledge.
The firm’s leaders saw the lab as an insur-
ance policy to make sure that Xerox retained its
position in the office of the future, even as
printing technologies changed. In mid-1971,
PARC’s staff created a detailed description of
their ideas for the office technology of the
1980s, which served both to win internal sup-
port for their work and to guide their subse-
quent efforts.80 By 1975, PARC’s achievements
were already being reported at length in
Business Week in a feature titled “The Paths to
the Paperless Office,” further reinforcing the
general faith in office automation as an
inevitable trend.77
The Bravo text editor was one of PARC’s
most influential creations.81 Because the Alto
computers designed at PARC had high-resolu-
tion bitmapped displays and were networked
to laser printers, users could create pages mix-
ing graphics with proportionally spaced text in
multiple fonts and sizes, display these pages
onscreen for direct editing, and print them with
unprecedented clarity. Previous text editors had
been oriented toward the creation of computer
text files. The formatting of printed output was
accomplished by entering special codes and
interpreted by a separate program. Bravo and its
successors merged the functions of these pro-
grams to create what was soon dubbed the
WYSIWYG (What You See Is What You Get)
approach to text editing. Its authors included
Butler Lampson, one of the creators of the QED
editor, and Charles Simonyi, who went on to
lead the development of Microsoft Word.
Simonyi himself has suggested that Microsoft
Word was based in large part on Bravo and bor-
rowed several of its novel features, including the
use of style sheets to simplify the application
and modification of formatting standards to dif-
ferent parts of a document.
Other PARC technologies let Alto users share
files on network servers and transmit electron-
ic mail messages using the Laurel email pro-
gram. By 1977, when the first mass-produced
personal computers such as the Apple II
appeared, these technologies were largely
mature and in daily use within Xerox PARC.
Office automation industry
Xerox had unveiled a plausible prototype
for the automated office in its lab, but turning
this into a successful product family was anoth-
er story. By the early 1980s, the producers of
minicomputers, word processing systems, and
even microcomputers were targeting the same
strategic goal: integrating word processing sys-
October–December 2006
Page 17
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
tems with networks and other kinds of data to
knit them into more broadly based office
automation systems. By the early 1980s, this
idea was so widely accepted that one study
evaluated whether word processing technolo-
gy had reached its “system potential” by deter-
mining whether it had “brought about any
change in management jobs.” Unsurprisingly,
only 3 out of 21 firms surveyed had “evolved
along this critical dimension.”82
Given the increasing competition and lower
margins developing in the market for stand-
alone word processing systems, this push for
managerial use made some sense, though it was
not in the end a particularly successful strategy.
The shift from clerical workers to managers and
professionals presumably reflected an assump-
tion that businesses might be more willing to
spend $15,000 or more per desk on a system to
help a manager manage or a lawyer litigate than
to spend the same amount on a system to make
a typist more productive. The more expensive
the employee, the more valuable a productivi-
ty boost would be and so the easier to rational-
ize the investment. But the strategy faced
insurmountable technical and economic issues,
most famously seen in Xerox’s efforts to sell
products derived from its pioneering Alto. The
Star workstation, introduced in 1981 for
$16,595 per workstation (plus the cost of print-
ers and servers) has gone down in computer
lore as a remarkable piece of engineering, whose
commercial prospects were crippled by its high
price tag and by a notable sluggishness. The
software designers’ ambition outstripped the
hardware’s power to support it.83
Xerox was by no means the only company
committing huge resources to the putatively
emerging market for integrated office automa-
tion systems. IBM, Wang, DEC, and Xerox were
all competing to set standards for the field.
DEC was selling its All-In-1 integrated office
system, including email and filing capabilities
as well as word processing. IBM had announced
a grand initiative called SNA to network togeth-
er all its varieties of computer for the smooth
exchange of documents and data between
office computers and large mainframes. All the
major players were exploring new technologies
such as video scanners and hybrid documents
containing text, charts, and graphics.84
Wang’s successor to its bestselling Word
Processing System, the Wang Office Information
System (OIS), launched in 1979 and first shipped
in 1980. The OIS was intended to broaden
Wang’s success with word processing into other
areas of business computing. Like its earlier
“clustered” word processing systems, the OIS
joined individual workstations, each with its
own microprocessor and memory, to file servers
holding hard disk drives.85
Leadership in this field was seen by many as
Wang’s to lose. By 1982, Wang Labs had cap-
tured just over half the market for “clustered”
word processing systems and faced little com-
petition there. A new version of its Office
Information System called Alliance claimed to
offer “data processing, word processing, audio
processing, image processing and networking,”
though in practice it worked slowly and not all
these features materialized.86 Meanwhile, its VS
line of powerful 32-bit minicomputers was
making a strong showing in the market for
mid-size computer systems.87
In 1984 it announced its Office integrated
software suite to integrate word processing,
telephony, and email. That year, as Wang’s
stock reached its all-time high, a leading com-
puter industry analyst praised the firm as the
“Orient Express of Office Automation,”
remarked on its high R&D spending and its
technological creativity, and suggested that,
“Wang has both management and marketing to
go the distance.” He forecast that by 1990 Wang
would be the third largest firm in the computer
industry.88 By that year it was, in fact, the tenth
biggest, but poised for bankruptcy rather than
growth. Its founder, An Wang, had insisted on
keeping family control of the business and
failed to set up a suitable succession process.
Wang Labs struggled, announcing ambitious
projects that appeared years late or not at all,
while its high-priced integrated systems came
under increasing pressure from competitors.
Office automation in use
Users, as well as producers, were struggling
to turn the promise of office automation into a
productive reality. During the early 1970s, cor-
porate computing managers (heads of data pro-
cessing and management information systems
departments) had viewed word processing as
part of office work and therefore of little more
concern to them than typewriters or dictating
machines. But the idea that the future of busi-
ness computing lay with elaborate, networked
systems able to file, process, and transmit doc-
uments of all kinds prompted corporate com-
puting managers to assert control over word
processing technology. According to one con-
temporary, this issue was often “discussed in
the abstract, or in the context of relatively
empty arguments about whether WP [word
processing] or DP managers would become the
‘information managers’ of the future.”84 The
prospect of office automation raised some fun-
Page 18
damental questions about the role of a central-
ized computer department in an era of distrib-
uted computer systems, topics which became
still more important during the late 1980s as
companies began to realize the same basic
vision through client-server systems based on
personal computer technology.
One example of the changing relationship
between office work and computing comes
from Exxon, which by 1980 was making a
major effort to establish itself as a supplier of
electronic office equipment, with products mar-
keted or under development in a dozen busi-
ness units including Qyx for automatic
typewriters and Vydec for high-end word
processors.89 Perhaps inspired by the desire to
provide a showplace for these technologies,
Exxon had in 1976 formed a joint team
between its computers and systems group and
its administrative services group as the conver-
gence of computer technology and office work
became apparent, thus avoiding the turf dis-
putes between the two that plagued many com-
panies. By 1980, a permanent Office Systems
Technology Division employed 23 people and
had the construction of a single integrated sys-
tem as its explicit goal. The leader of Exxon’s
effort wrote of an automated system “having
work stations in every manager’s, professional’s,
and secretary’s office, tied together into a net-
work via appropriate communications.”90
But as a central, functional group, the Exxon
team’s practical authority over the firm’s many
offices was limited. This problem must have
been compounded by its conviction that “the
real target for office automation was the man-
agerial and professional worker.”90,91 This jus-
tified a focus on things like shared calendar
systems and project control tools. Managers,
however, were much better placed than typists
to resist the efforts of office experts to reor-
ganize their work habits. In practice, firms
were more likely to force secretaries into
word processing centers than impose collab-
oration systems onto their senior managers.
Professionals and managers exercised more
autonomy, carried out less routine work, and
were culturally and organizationally better
equipped to resist encroachment on their pre-
ferred ways of doing things.
The “office of the future,” with its beige
cubicles, bland furniture, and computer moni-
tors and keyboards on every desk became a
familiar setting in popular culture, appearing
in 1980s films such as After Hours and Working
Girl. It sometimes served as an emblem of the
emptiness and impersonality of corporate cap-
italism, most consistently on the pages of
Processed World, a radical magazine published
by politically minded and underemployed
office workers of the San Francisco area. “Are
you doing the processing? … or are you being
processed?” asked the cover of the first issue,
under a picture of someone whose head was
replaced by a computer (see Figure 3 next page).
The magazine was sometimes sold with the
chant, “If you hate your job then you’ll love
this magazine.”92 Academics and critics pro-
duced a wealth of books on the consequences
of white-collar automation, including Barbara
Garson’s snappily titled The Electronic
Sweatshop: How Computers are Transforming the
Office of the Future into the Factory of the Past and
Shoshana Zuboff’s weighty In the Age of the
Smart Machine: The Future of Work and Power.93
Rise of the personal computer
The modern-day ubiquity of word processing
and email is, of course, a consequence of per-
sonal computer technology’s proliferation. But
thus far the story of the conceptual, technical,
commercial, and practical development of word
processing has been told almost without refer-
ence to the personal computer. This is because,
at least until the mid-1980s, the personal com-
puter industry made no real contribution to the
development of word processing technology.
Whereas new applications such as video games
and spreadsheets maximized the strengths of
personal computers while minimizing their
weaknesses, the reverse was true of word process-
ing. Until the mid-1980s, word processing was
better tackled using other kinds of computers.
In 1976, most people who were getting their
hands on early personal computers such as the
Apple I or an MITS Altair had to be prepared to
solder their own circuit boards, build their own
cases, or create their own interface boards. The
same year saw the launch of the Wang Word
Processor line with its polished documentation,
easy-to-use menu systems, and file sharing capa-
bilities. Early personal computer users also faced
a dearth of high-quality applications software.
The situation was slow to improve, even after
new machines such as the Apple II and TRS-80
were mass-produced from 1977 on. The first
word processing programs for the Apple II, such
as Electric Pencil and Apple Writer, were crude
copies of those produced for minicomputers
and dedicated word processing systems.94 The
programs were often outpaced by touch typists,
had badly designed user interfaces, and lacked
even the most basic features. The user manual
for Electric Pencil, for example, warned users
that “Words or phrases may be underlined
ONLY in lines shorter than 62 characters and
October–December 2006
Page 19
terminated by a LINE FEED. Underlining is not
permissible within justified text.”95
The only real virtue of personal computers
for word processing was their low cost: a mini-
mal Apple II system plus software was much
cheaper than, for example, a Wang. However,
the minimal Apple II system was so badly suit-
ed to word processing that only a dedicated
hobbyist would be likely to bother. As one
unusually frank enthusiast admitted, “An
Apple II can be tortured into a decent word
processor—at great expense.”96 Standard Apple
II machines, even when equipped with an
optional but common floppy disk drive, had
only a 40-column display and lacked lowercase
letters altogether. This made it necessary to
scroll the screen to read an entire line of text,
and forced programs to use colored or inverted
text to represent lowercase letters.
Further hardware expansions could remedy
these problems but the new capabilities
remained clumsy. For example, the only way to
type a capital letter at the start of a sentence
was to push the shift button twice, type the let-
ter, then push the shift button twice more to
reset to lowercase. Hobbyists on a budget
would connect personal computers to televi-
sions rather than dedicated monitors, but text
was hard to read—a conspicuous problem for
word processing. The other problem was the
cost of a high-quality daisywheel printer suit-
able for business correspondence, and the
installation of a serial card to drive it. In the
late 1970s, such printers cost $3,000 to $5,000,
closing much of the cost gap between an Apple
and a dedicated word processing unit.97
Matters were better with early business-ori-
ented personal computers based on the CP/M
operating system, such as those produced by
IMSAI and Cromemco. These machines con-
nected to separate terminals and so could be
plugged into just the same expensive high-
quality text displays and keyboards as mini-
computers. Cromemco had a reputation for
producing some of the most solid and busi-
nesslike CP/M hardware. But its software lagged
far behind. One reviewer noted that users were
liable to lose a lot of text when using its
Writemaster program, because the command to
delete everything from cursor to the start of the
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Figure 3. The radical San Francisco magazine Processed World illustrates the resentments felt by some
office workers during the 1980s toward the use of office automation technology. (Reproduced with
permission of Chris Carlsson; http://www.processedworld.com.) The issue 1 cover (April 1981, on the
left) is “Are you doing the processing?” by Linda Wiens. The issue 12 cover (November 1984, on the
right) is “Non-User-Friendly” by Hal Robins.
Page 20
file was only one key away from that used to
remove underlining and operated without any
further confirmation from the user.98
MicroPro’s WordStar, launched in 1978,
established itself as the leading word processor
software for CP/M machines. Although it was
considerably better than Electric Pencil, it suf-
fered from a badly designed user interface, and
the nonstandard nature of CP/M systems
required users to spend considerable effort con-
figuring it to work with their own computer,
terminal, and printer. This also limited its capa-
bilities to those supported on lowest-common-
denominator systems—for example, WordStar
used the combination of the control key and
S,E,D and X to move the cursor around the
screen because many systems lacked dedicated
cursor keys.
Well into the 1980s, corporate users contin-
ued to prefer dedicated word processing systems
to personal computers. WordStar picked up fea-
tures over the years, but these only added to its
awkwardness. One 1983 review of WordStar 3.0
described it as “thousands of Rube Goldberg
straps and ropes holding things together with-
out any overall unifying concept (or even a
dozen).”99 The situation was still worse with
software written for cheaper home computers
such as the Commodore 64. As late as 1984, an
introductory guide could report that “most
word processing programs for home computers
are written by high-tech freaks who’ve never
learned to type properly.”100
An exhaustive comparison between the fea-
tures and documentation of 14 microcomput-
er programs and dedicated systems as of late
1981 found that “dedicated word processors
and microcomputer word-processing programs
are comparable in their abilities.”101 Three of
the top four systems reviewed were dedicated
systems, and the author noted that these were
much better documented and supported than
the software packages. However, the cost of the
dedicated full-screen units ranged from
$16,000 to $6,000, making them more expen-
sive than comparable microcomputer systems.
The IBM personal computer, launched in
1981, quickly displaced CP/M machines as the
standard for business use. Its capabilities were
only modestly greater than those of its CP/M-
based competitors, but because IBM standard-
ized screen, keyboard, and disk options,
software writers could exploit its features with-
out making users go through complex config-
uration procedures. For the next few years, the
IBM PC version of WordStar, a faithful duplica-
tion of the CP/M original, remained the lead-
ing word processor.
By the mid-1980s, the combination of more
flexibility and lower costs made many compa-
nies favor a switch toward personal computer
word processing systems over dedicated
machines. Word processor software for person-
al computers gradually got better, though this
was largely a matter of more effectively dupli-
cating the user interfaces and capabilities
already available on dedicated word processing
machines and minicomputer systems. IBM
offered DisplayWrite, which mimicked the
interface of its Displaywriter system. MultiMate,
which enjoyed considerable success in the cor-
porate market, was popular largely because its
user interface closely resembled that of the
Wang machines. Meanwhile WordPerfect,
which in the late 1980s overtook WordStar as
the leading personal computer word processing
software, was originally created for Data
General minicomputers in 1980.102
Although personal computers were by this
point doing a creditable job of duplicating ded-
icated systems, they remained isolated
machines. Personal computer networking was
primitive, and the adoption of email, file shar-
ing, and printer sharing lagged behind predic-
tions. During the early 1980s, the shift to
personal computers—rather than to the kinds
of integrated office automation networks being
promoted by firms like Wang, Xerox, and
DEC—essentially froze the dominant paradigm
for automatic office technology in the mold of
the stand-alone video screen models first intro-
duced in 1973: a self-contained machine with
a keyboard, screen, disk drive, and printer.
The idea of networked machines, graphical-
ly sophisticated machines hooked into data-
bases and sharing electronic mail, only became
commonplace during the 1990s. Falling costs,
technological improvements, and new software
such as Lotus Notes made it possible to add
these capabilities piecemeal to ordinary per-
sonal computers without raising their costs to
an unacceptable level. As everyone with an
interest in the history of personal computing is
surely aware, the work of Xerox PARC signifi-
cantly influenced the eventual development of
hardware and software, with personal comput-
ers slowly evolving into something much like
the office automation workstations envisioned
at PARC.
Conclusions
The story of word processing and the origins
of office automation demonstrates the com-
plexity of the history of computer applications.
The fundamental hardware and software tech-
nologies needed for word processing were cre-
October–December 2006
Page 21
ated for other purposes and in other social con-
texts, before being assembled during the early
1970s as the falling costs of interactive com-
puting opened new potential applications.
Even computerized text editing and formatting
was well established years before the first com-
puterized word processor was marketed. The
concept of word processing, however, was orig-
inally tied to automatic typewriters and cen-
tralized dictating machines and was entwined
with a vision of routine, factory-like typing
pools. By the mid-1970s, the technologies of
computerized text processing and formatting
had come together with the word processing
concept to provide the basis for a new breed of
word processing workstations. Yet a decade
later these dedicated machines were already
being replaced by general-purpose computers,
as people came to think of a word processor as
a piece of software for a personal computer
rather than a specialized office appliance.
Like other visions of starkly modern techno-
logical futures, the “office of the future” pro-
moted during the late 1970s has been realized in
a slower, messier, and less complete manner than
once expected. Rather than a sudden shift to the
paperless automated office of the future, the
result was a hybrid of old and new technologies
in which documents were prepared using per-
sonal computers but usually disseminated on
paper. Electronic document transmission was
particularly slow to take hold. During the 1990s,
it was common for documents to be prepared on
a computer, then printed for fax transmittal to a
recipient (a process of redigitization and reprint-
ing) and optically scanned at the far end into
another computer. As the new ease of printing
sent office paper use to record levels, a joke arose
that the paperless office would arrive at around
the same time as the paperless toilet.
The consequences of word processing and
office automation for the organization of office
labor have been the opposite of those original-
ly predicted. In the early 1970s, word process-
ing was a new approach to the division of labor
in which typing and stenography tasks were to
be removed from secretaries and carried out on
an efficient, industrial basis in a word process-
ing center. This approach was justified by the
high cost of specialist machinery as well as the
efficiency inherent through work specialization
and standardization.
Computers and networks have altered the
organization of white-collar work in many
ways over the past three decades. Much work
really has been centralized in factory-like set-
tings: for example, with the creation of cen-
tralized and regimented call centers to deal
with customer support, the international out-
sourcing of clerical tasks, and the automation
of decision making for things like loan
approval. Yet this has not happened with typ-
ing and editing work, the original task of word
processing centers and the core activity of the
automated office.
As inexpensive word processing systems and
programs spread through offices during the
1980s, a different dynamic took hold. Typing
and editing work returned to the office, carried
out by word processors on the desks of secre-
taries and, increasingly, of professional and
managerial staff. Today, general typing and
editing work is more distributed than ever, as
the number of personal secretaries has plum-
meted, and more executives and professionals
type their own correspondence and reports.
The shift to email, instant messaging, and
other forms of electronic communication has
reinforced this trend, dispelling the formerly
widespread assumption that typing is low-status
work suitable only for women.
Specialized data entry and typing jobs are
actually dwindling, with the US Department of
Labor’s Bureau of Labor Statistics projecting a
continued decline in the number of specialized
data entry and word processing jobs as data is
increasingly transmitted electronically, entered
by customers, or captured automatically.103
Word processing has indeed changed the
world, although not quite as expected.
Acknowledgments
I thank the anonymous reviewers for their
comments, Dietmar Wolfram, Maria Haigh and
Kate Johnson for their careful reading of draft
versions, Ulrich Steinhilper for answering my
questions and send me a copy of his book, and
Jim Battle for providing insight on the rela-
tionship between Wang’s 2200 computer fami-
ly and its word processing models.
References and notes
1. According to material gathered by historian Martin
Campbell-Kelly, by fall 1983, WordStar had sold
650,000 copies with a retail value of $325,000,000
while VisiCalc and Lotus 1-2-3, the two leading
spreadsheets of this era, had 800,000 copies with a
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Word processing has indeed
changed the world, although
not quite as expected.
Page 22
retail value of $225,000,000. M. Campbell-Kelly,
From Airline Reservations to Sonic the Hedgehog: A
History of the Software Industry, MIT Press, 2003, p.
215. By 1996, word processors were outselling
spreadsheets measured by volume as well as by
value. M. Campbell-Kelly, From Airline Reservations
to Sonic the Hedgehog, p. 270.
2. The parallel with data processing is explicitly
made in W.A. Kleinschrod, “The ‘Gal Friday’ is a
Typing Specialist Now,” Administrative Manage-
ment, vol. 32, no. 6, 1971, pp. 20-27. The
origins, usage, and spread of data processing are
discussed in T. Haigh, “The Chromium-Plated
Tabulator: Institutionalizing an Electronic Revolu-
tion, 1954−1958,” IEEE Annals of the History of
Computing, vol. 23, no. 4, 2001, pp. 75-104.
3. U. Steinhilper, Don’t Talk—Do It: From Flying to
Word Processing, Independent Books, 2006. The
quotation is from page 91. He wanted the
diagram (p. 166) to be included on all the IBM
folders used to hold sales proposals. Steinhilper
wrote that he pushed the idea in various ways
within IBM Germany and during a spell at IBM
World Trade’s European headquarters. He
promoted it at a 1959 meeting of the IBM Hun-
dred Percent club in Madrid (pp. 102-109).
Exactly what word processing meant at that time
is not clear—Steinhilper has written that the
arrival of dictating equipment in the IBM product
line in 1962 led him to redefine it as the process
of “making a thought audible, visible and distrib-
utable.” By the time the MT/ST arrived in 1964,
he was Country Manager for Electric Typewriters,
and promoted the Word Processing concept
along with the machines (pp. 134-146). He
began to promote the idea that customer firms
should create a“Manager of Business Operations
(Text)” of equal status to their existing data pro-
cessing manager (p. 124). Secondary sources
have often claimed that the English “word pro-
cessing” originated as a translation of the well-
established German textverabeitung. In fact, the
English version was the first to be coined, though
the German version was the first to achieve any
currency. I have yet to find evidence that IBM
used the term in the US prior to 1971 in advertis-
ing its office products. Neither does the term
appear to have been used much outside the firm
prior to 1970. From his book it is clear that Stein-
hilper feels disappointed in IBM’s failure to fully
embrace the idea of word processing, and that it
“never dared” (p. 142) to rename its Office Prod-
ucts Division.
4. The first mention of word processing in Adminis-
trative Management appears to have been in
“Auburn U Learns about Word Processing,”
Administrative Management, vol. 31, no. 6, 1970,
p. 81. The longer feature on new developments
in automatic typing—which included the quota-
tion given, a two-page report on a meeting of
the Word Processing Association of Arkansas, and
an advertisement for a new automatic typewriter
called the ITEL Word Processor—was J.G. Zalkind,
“Automatic Typing Keys in New Advances,”
Administrative Management, vol. 31, no. 11, 1970,
pp. 36-44. The prevalance of early adopters of the
term in the southern US may imply that the
regional IBM Office Products team led the way in
promoting it.
5. W.A. Kleinshrod, Word Processing: An AMA Man-
agement Briefing, AMACOM, 1974.
6. Modern Office Procedures, a rival publication to
Administrative Management, offered its first
discussion of word processing a few months later
in “A New Age of Automated Writing,” Modern
Office Procedures, vol. 16, no. 8, 1971, pp. 14-15.
7. Inventor of the Week Archive: Carl G. Sontheimer—
The Cuisinart Food Processor, Massachusetts Insti-
tute of Technology, 1998; http://web.mit.edu/
invent/iow/sontheimer.html.
8. W.A. Kleinshrod, Word Processing, p. 3.
9. “The Office of the Future,” Business Week, 30
June 1975, p. 48.
10. “Management and the Information Revolution,”
Administrative Management, vol. 31, no. 1, 1970,
11. International Business Machines, Office Products
Division, “Are You Unconsciously Telling Your
Boss You Can’t Handle a Bigger Job?” Administra-
tive Management, vol. 32, no. 6, 1971, pp. 30-
31. Braverman discussed early word processing
and its relationship to scientific management on
pp. 344-348.
12. International Business Machines, IBM Office Prod-
ucts Division Highlights, 1976; http://www-03.ibm.
com/ibm/history/exhibits/modelb/modelb_office.
13. W.H. Liebman, “Super-Typewriters: The Word-
Processing Industry Has Arrived,” Barron’s Nation-
al Business and Financial Weekly, 31 March 1975.
14. For example, K.F. Curley, Word Processing: First
Step to the Office of the Future, Praeger, 1983, pp.
45-49, defines no fewer than seven word process-
ing product groups, three of which lacked video
displays entirely or could display only a single line
of text.
15. Early Office Museum, Antique Special Purpose Office
Typewriters, 2005; http://www.officemuseum.
com/typewriters_office_special.htm.
16. R.R. Kay, “What We Found Out About Automatic
Typing,” Administrative Management, vol. 30, no.
11, 1969, pp. 32-34.
17. The automatic typing systems of the early 1970s
are discussed in J.R. Cochran, “Automatic Typing
and Text Editing Devices,” Administrative
Management, vol. 32, no. 6, 1971, pp. 44-50,
October–December 2006
Page 23
and “A New Age of Automated Writing,” Modern
Office Procedures, vol. 16, no. 8, 1971, pp. 14-15.
18. “Word Processing—Hardware/Software,”
Business Automation, vol. 19, no. 9, 1972, pp. 44-
46, 48.
19. W.D. Smith, “Lag Persists for Business Equipment,”
New York Times, 26 Oct. 1971, pp. 59-60.
20. R. Natale, “‘Selectrifying’ the Typing Pool,”
Chicago Tribune, 31 Oct. 1971, p. E18.
21. Leffingwell and the scientific office management
movement, and its relationship to office technol-
ogy, have been discussed in S. Strom, Beyond the
Typewriter: Gender, Class and the Origins of Mod-
ern American Office Work, 1900−1930, Univ. Illi-
nois Press, 1992; M.W. Davies, Woman’s Place is
at the Typewriter: Office Work and Office Workers,
1870−1930, Temple Univ. Press, 1982; and H.
Braverman, Labor and Monopoly Capital: The
Degradation of Work in the Twentieth Century;
Monthly Review Press, 1974.
22. F.W. Taylor, The Principles of Scientific
Management, Harper & Brothers, 1911.
23. W.H. Leffingwell, ed., The Office Appliance
Manual, Nat’l Assoc. Office Appliance Manufac-
turers, 1926.
24. D.W., “Reader Feedback: Is Boredom Necessary?”
Business Automation, vol. 19, no. 11, 1972, p. 8.
25. Reports in the general press began to challenge
the connection between women’s liberation and
typing pools: for example, G. Dullea, “Is It a Boon
for Secretaries—Or Just an Automated Ghetto?”
New York Times, 5 Feb. 1974.
26. Many paper tape systems, including teletype
tape, actually had only five channels. However,
coding schemes incorporate two “cases,” origi-
nally special characters used to shift between let-
ters mode and numbers mode, which effectively
gave a total of 6 bits for each character. T.
Jennings, ACSII: American Standard Code for Infor-
mation Infiltration, 2004; http://www.wps.com/
projects/codes/index.html.
27. ASCII is a 7-bit standard, though modern imple-
mentations are invariably 8-bit and fill the
remaining positions with additional characters,
including those required for other European lan-
guages. Lowercase letters were not officially
defined in the initial 1963 version of the
standard, but were added in 1967.
28. W.J. Hutchins, Machine Translation: Past, Present,
Future, Halsted Press, 1986, section 4.3.
29. However, the source code to be processed was
almost always punched onto cards rather than
entered directly into the computer system. Code
libraries were generally maintained in card files
rather than computer files until the 1970s. The
development of code library management pack-
ages is discussed in J.A. Piscopo, interview by T.
Haigh, 3 May 2002, OH 342, Charles Babbage
Inst., Univ. of Minnesota, Minneapolis; and M.
Goetz, “Memoirs of a Software Pioneer: Part 1,”
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing, vol. 24,
no. 1, 2002, pp. 43-56.
30. R.E. Griswold, “A History of the SNOBOL Program-
ming Languages,” History of Programming
Languages, R.L. Wexelblat, ed., Academic Press,
1981, pp. 601-644.
31. C.P. Bourne and T.B. Hahn, A History of Online
Information Services: 1963−1976, MIT Press,
32. S. Levy, Hackers: The Heroes of the Digital Revolu-
tion, Anchor Press/Doubleday, 1984.
33. J.M. Graetz, “The Origins of Spacewar,” Creative
Computing, Aug. 1981.
34. D.P.B. Smith, Type Justifying Program, 9 May
1963; http://www.dpbsmith.com/tj2.html. The
online version includes annotation by D.P.B.
Smith and a scan of the original memo describ-
ing the system.
35. J. McCarthy, “John McCarthy’s 1959 Memoran-
dum,” IEEE Annals of the History of Computing,
vol. 14, no. 1, 1992, pp. 19-23.
36. F. Corbato, M. Merwin-Daggett, and R.C. Caley,
“An Experimental Time-Sharing System,” Proc.
Spring Joint Computer Conf., vol. 21, AFIPS Press,
1962, pp. 335-344.
37. L.P. Deutsch and B.W. Lampson, “An Online Edi-
tor,” Comm. ACM, vol. 10, no. 12, 1967, pp. 793-
799. A broad overview of the capabilities of the
leading editors of this era is given in A. van Dam
and D.E. Rice, “On-line Text Editing: A Survey,”
Computing Surveys, vol. 3, no. 3, 1971, pp. 93-114.
38. The widely used vi full-screen editor for Unix sys-
tems, produced by Bill Joy in 1976, included an
alternative line editor interface, ex, having the
same basic functionality. But from the mid-1970s
on, full-screen editors were increasingly common
on higher-end systems.To this day, Microsoft
Windows includes the much despised EDLIN line
editor, which was the only editor supplied with
MS-DOS until the release of version 5.0 in 1991
even though DOS was designed from the begin-
ning for use with video monitors.
39. The story of Emacs is discussed in R.M. Stallman,
The Emacs Full-Screen Editor, 1987; http://www.
lysator.liu.se/history/garb/txt/87-1-emacs.txt;
and S. Williams, Free as in Freedom, O’Reilly Press,
2002, chapter 6.
40. Thompson discussed his work on techniques to
process regular expressions in K. Thompson,
“Regular Expression Search Algorithm,” Comm.
ACM, vol. 11, no. 6, 1968, pp. 419-422. The his-
tory of QED variants is recounted in D. Ritchie, An
Incomplete History of the QED Text Editor, Bell
Labs; http://cm.bell-labs.com/cm/cs/who/dmr/
qed.html.
41. B.K. Reid and D. Hanson, “An Annotated Bibliog-
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Page 24
raphy of Background Material on Text Manipula-
tion,” ACM SIGPLAN Notices, Proc. ACM SIGPLAN
SIGOA Symp. Text Manipulation, vol. 16, no. 6,
1981, pp. 157-160. Use of the Unix tools for
word processing was described in M. Krieger,
Word Processing on the Unix System (A Byte Book),
McGraw-Hill, 1985.
42. TeX is described in D.E. Knuth, The TeXbook
(Computers and Typesetting, Volume A), Addison-
Wesley, 1984.
43. “Time Sharing: An Update Report,” Administrative
Management, vol. 31, no. 3, 1970, pp. 20-22.
44. “Is T/S OK for WP?” Administrative Management,
vol. 32, no. 6, 1971, p. 50.
45. W.H. Liebman, “Super-Typewriters: The Word-
Processing Industry Has Arrived,” Barron’s Nation-
al Business and Financial Weekly, 31 Mar. 1975.
46. One newspaper layout system is discussed in M.J.
Spier et al., “The Typeset 10 Message Exchange
Facility: A Case Study in Systemic Design,” ACM
SIGOPS Operating System Review, vol. 9, no. 1,
1974, pp. 10-18.
47. “Do-It-Yourself Phototypesetting,” Business Week,
6 Sept. 1976, p. 56. One early photocomposition
system of technical publishing was presented in
F.L. Alt and J.Y. Kirk, “Computer Photocomposi-
tion of Technical Text,” Comm. ACM, vol. 16, no.
6, 1973, pp. 386-391.
48. R.A. Hendel, “Minicomputer Word Processing: A
Two-Year Case History,” Business Automation, vol.
19, no. 8, 1972, pp. 35-37. A more general dis-
cussion of minicomputers and word processing
was given in J.R. Hanse, “Minis Impact Word-
Processing,” Infosystems, vol. 23, no. 11, 1976,
pp. 58.
49. DEC itself eventually recognized the potential of
word processing as a major application for its
minicomputers, and in 1977 launched specialized
word processing systems that could be used
independently (when configured with disks and a
printer) or as “intelligent terminals” for word pro-
cessing and other tasks when connected to a
PDP-11 minicomputer. International Data Corpo-
ration (IDC), “Major Vendor Strategies in the Elec-
tronic Office—Part I,” Market and Product Reports
Collection (CBI 55), Charles Babbage Inst., Univ. of
Minnesota, Minneapolis, Nov. 1983.
50. “DEC Merges Word and Data Processing,” Busi-
ness Week, 6 June 1977, p. 94C.
51. K.F. Curley, Word Processing: First Step to the Office
of the Future, Praeger, 1983, p. 44. Lexitron was
founded in 1970 by “boy genius” Stephen Kurtin
and went public in 1972, according to W.H. Lieb-
man, “Super-Typewriters: The Word-Processing
Industry Has Arrived,” Barron’s National Business
and Financial Weekly, 31 Mar. 1975.The Lexitron
is a rather obscure machine, and fits the descrip-
tion of a machine first advertised and reported in
Administrative Management in June 1971 as the
“Editron” by a company called Word Processing
Products Inc. Lexitron Corp. ran into problems
and was purchased by Raytheon in 1978, but
despite finally launching a floppy-disk-based
word processor that year, it continued to strug-
gle. “The Cautious Comeback of a Onetime
Word Processing Champ,” Business Week, 5 May
1980, p. 118E.
52. “Vydec Finds it Helps to have Exxon’s Backing,”
Business Week, 21 Nov. 1977, p. 102D. The price
given is for 1977. Vydec is also discussed in K.F.
Curley, Word Processing: First Step to the Office of
the Future, p. 44.
53. W.H. Liebman, “Super-Typewriters: The Word-
Processing Industry Has Arrived,” Barron’s Nation-
al Business and Financial Weekly, 31 Mar. 1975.
54. “Why Qume Shot Ahead in Electronic Printers,”
Business Week, 13 June 1977, p. 42J.
55. “A Computer That’s Geared to Small Business,”
Business Week, 21 Apr. 1975, p. 122D.
56. Each of these represented a bundling of its exist-
ing 2200 series processor, first sold in 1973, with
a video terminal and hard disk (model 30), floppy
disk (model 20) or tape (model 10) storage. See
http://www.thebattles.net/wang/models.html#
prehistory.
57. Good technical information on Wang’s early
word processors is hard to come by. The original
brochure announcing the Word Processing sys-
tem is available online at Wang Labs, Wang. The
Last Word in Word Processing, 1976; http://www.
harolds928people.org/images/wpbroch.htm.
Howard Koplow, who led development of the
Word Processor family, takes credit for persuad-
ing An Wang that microprocessors should be
used to create the Model 30 file server, rather
than waiting for the completion of the VS series
of minicomputers then under development. H.
Koplow, Harold’s 920 People—Harold Koplow;
http://www.harolds928people.org/people/
koplow.htm.
58. Wang Labs, Wang. The Last Word in Word Process-
ing, 1976; http://www.harolds928people.org/
images/wpbroch.htm.
59. A. Wang and E. Linden, Lessons: An Autobiography,
Addison-Wesley, 1986, p. 178.
60. J. Zygmont, “Look Who Shrunk the Computer,”
Boston Globe Magazine, 29 Dec. 2002, p. 24.
61. “A Bold Lanier Takes Another Shot at IBM,” Busi-
ness Week, 21 Nov. 1977, p. 102H.
62. “A Brash Lanier Makes its Move,” Business Week,
9 Oct. 1979, p. 102H.
63. “Lanier Aims to Win Back its Office Leadership,”
Business Week, 16 May 1983, p. 133.
64. “IBM Enters the ‘Office of the Future,’” Business
Week, 14 Feb. 1976, p. 133.
65. International Business Machines, IBM Office Prod-
October–December 2006
Page 25
ucts Division Highlights, 1976; http://www-03.
ibm.com/ibm/history/exhibits/modelb/modelb_
office.html.
66. “IBM’s Office of the Future Entry,” Business Week,
19 Nov. 1979, p. 150G.
67. “When IBM is a Low-Priced Entry,” Business Week,
7 July 1980, p. 82B. A more powerful IBM prod-
uct, the 5520 Information System, was a competi-
tor for Wang’s Office Information System. It
networked up to 18 terminals to share files on a
hard disk drive and a higher speed printer.
68. “Wang’s Game Plan for the Office,” Business
Week, 15 Dec. 1980, p. 84.
69. T.M. Lodahl, “Designing the Automated Office:
Organizational Functions of Data and Text,”
Emerging Office Systems, R.M. Landau, ed., Ablex,
1982, pp. 59-72.
70. “Putting the Office in Place,” Business Week, 30
June 1975, p. 56. The problems involved in cen-
tralized word processing pools were subsequent-
ly discussed widely: for example, in B. Garson,
The Electronic Sweatshop: How Computers are
Transforming the Office of the Future into the Facto-
ry of the Past, Simon and Schuster, 1988.
71. K.F. Curley, Word Processing: First Step to the Office
of the Future, pp. 47-48.
72. J. Harnett, “Demand for More Advanced
Facilities—Word Processing and the New Genera-
tion of Secretarial Workstations” Financial Times,
1989, Survey p. IV.
73. “Here Comes the Automated Office!” Infosystems,
vol. 22, no. 9, 1975, pp. 13-15, 24, and “The
Paths to the Paperless Office,” Business Week, 30
June 1975, p. 80.
74. In the 1950s, the phrase “office automation” fea-
tured prominently in discussions of administrative
computing such as Automation in the Office, Nat’l
Office Management Assoc., 1957, and A.N. Sear-
es, “Advancements in Office Automation,” The
Hopper, vol. 4, no. 2, 1953, pp. 6-9.
75. There may be another, more pragmatic reason
for the vanishing of the term office automation:
the phrase was trademarked by Automation
Associates, a small firm founded by R. Hunt
Brown that issued a series of glossy “Office
Automation Reports” on administrative comput-
ing technologies from 1955 onward. R.H. Brown,
“Office Automation: A Handbook on Automatic
Data Processing,” 1959, Market and Product
Reports Collection (CBI 55), Charles Babbage
Inst., Univ. of Minnesota, Minneapolis.
76. The history of the management information sys-
tem concept is explored in T. Haigh, “Inventing
Information Systems: The Systems Men and the
Computer, 1950−1968,” Business History Rev.,
vol. 75, no. 1, 2001, pp. 15-61.
77. “The Paths to the Paperless Office,” Business
Week, 30 June 1975, p. 80.
78. Engelbart’s story has been recounted in many
places, but the only full-length study of his group
is T. Bardini, Bootstrapping: Douglas Engelbart,
Coevolution, and the Origins of Personal Comput-
ing, Stanford Univ. Press, 2000.
79. No transcript of the demonstration has been
published. The quotation is based on the video
recording hosted by Stanford University’s “Mouse
Site” (http://sloan.stanford.edu/MouseSite/
MouseSitePg1.html). Rather inconveniently, this
is broken into 35 tiny pieces of streaming video—
at the time of writing the appropriate one may
be found at http://vodreal.stanford.edu/engel/
05enge1200.ram.
80. M. Hiltzik, Dealers of Lightning: Xerox PARC and
the Dawn of the Computer Age, HarperBusiness,
1999, pp. 121-124.
81. B. Lampson, “Personal Distributed Computing: the
Alto and Ethernet Software,” Proc. ACM Conference
on the History of Personal Workstations, ACM Press,
1986, pp. 101-131. Another PARC editor, Gypsy,
developed by Larry Tesler, simplified the user inter-
face through the elimination of different command
modes and the use of the mouse to cut and paste
text. This improved interface style was subsequent-
ly used in an improved version of Bravo, named
BravoX. Like NLS, the original Bravo responded
quite differently to a given user action depending
on which of many command modes had been
selected. With BravoX, an action like typing a word
or selecting text with the mouse would have a con-
sistent outcome whatever commands had been
used previously. This made it much easier for non-
specialist users to work with the program.
82. K.F. Curley, Word Processing: First Step to the Office
of the Future, p. 109. Curley’s book appears to be
a lightly edited version of her 1981 Harvard Busi-
ness School thesis, and although the book does
not specify when the survey was conducted,
internal evidence suggests a date around 1979.
For another study with similar findings and a
comparable definition of the “highest level” of
word processor use as being for “systemwide
reinvention,” see B.M. Johnson and R.E. Rice,
“Reinvention in the Innovation Process: The Case
of Word Processing,” The New Media: Communi-
cation, Research and Technology, R.E. Rice, ed.,
Sage Publications, 1984, pp. 157-183.
83. The efforts of Xerox to commercialize Alto tech-
nology receive their most thorough discussion in
M. Hiltzik, Dealers of Lightning: Xerox PARC and
the Dawn of the Computer Age, HarperBusiness,
1999, pp. 259-288 and 361-370.
84. International Data Corporation (IDC), “Major
Vendor Strategies in the Electronic Office—Part
I,” Market and Product Reports Collection (CBI
55), Charles Babbage Inst., Univ. of Minnesota,
Nov. 1983.
IEEE Annals of the History of Computing
Remembering the Office of the Future
Page 26
85. Technical data on the specifications of various
OIS models is given at J. Donoghu, Wang OIS
Information Center; http://www.cass.net/
~jdonoghu/. The first OIS file server unit was
apparently a rebadged Word Processor 30 model.
86. V. Flanders, “Wang’s Integrated Products: Past,
Present and Future,” Access 86: The Magazine for
Wang System Users, Dec. 1986, p. 33.
87. “Wang Labs Challenges the Goliaths,” Business
Week, 4 June 1979, p. 100.
88. S.T. McClellan, The Coming Computer Industry
Shakeout: Winners, Losers, and Survivors, John
Wiley & Sons, 1984, pp. 299-303.
89. S. Lohr, “Exxon Said to Lag in Office Machines:
But Company Calls Problems Growing,” New
York Times, 12 Aug. 1980, p. D1. Exxon’s office
automation foray lost hundreds of millions of dol-
lars, and never succeeded in integrating its prod-
uct lines before being wound down from 1983
onward. “Exxon Wants Out of the Automated
Office,” Business Week, 17 Dec. 1984, p. 39.
90. R.M. Dickinson, “Can Centralized Planning for
Office Automation Ever Work in a Large Corpora-
tion?” Emerging Office Systems, R. Landau, J. Bair,
and J. Siegman, eds., Ablex, 1982, pp. 21-38.
91. The idea that “the cost figures for secretarial serv-
ices compared with management and profession-
al services suggest, however, that it is in these
areas the real benefits lie,” was also expressed in
Xephon Technology Transfer, “Office Automation:
An IBM User Perspective,” Gartner Group, Market
and Product Reports Collection (CBI 55), Charles
Babbage Inst., Univ. of Minnesota, Feb. 1982.
92. Processed World Web site, 15 June 2006; http://
www.processedworld.com.
93. B. Garson, The Electronic Sweatshop: How Comput-
ers are Transforming the Office of the Future into
the Factory of the Past, Simon and Schuster, 1988;
and S. Zuboff, In The Age of the Smart Machine:
The Future of Work and Power, Basic Books, 1988.
A voluminous academic literature appeared on
the impact of the new technology on the organi-
zation of office work, a good review of which is
presented in M.C. Murphree, “New Technology
and Office Tradition: The Not-So-Changing
World of the Secretary,” Computer Chips and
Paper Clips: Technology and Women’s Employment,
Volume II: Case Studies and Policy Perspectives,
Commission on Behavioral and Social Sciences
and Education, ed., 1987, pp. 98-135.
94. A brief discussion of the early market for word
processing software is given in M. Campbell-
Kelly, From Airline Reservations to Sonic the Hedge-
hog, pp. 217-219.
95. M. Shrayer, The Electric Pencil Word Processor
Operator’s Manual, TheBattles.net, 1977; http://
www.thebattles.net/sol20/manuals/pencil.pdf.
The history of Electric Pencil is discussed in P.
Freiberger and M. Swaine, Fire in the Valley: The
Making of the Personal Computer, 2nd ed.,
McGraw-Hill, 2000, pp. 186-188.
96. P.A. McWilliams, The Word Processing Book: A
Short Course in Computer Literacy, 5th ed.,
Prelude Press, 1983, p. 211.
97. Even in 1983, turning an Apple II into a machine
capable of running WordStar well remained a tor-
tuous process, costing several thousand dollars in
addition to the price of a printer. See J. Mar, “Word
Processing on the Apple with WordStar and Diablo,”
Creative Computing, vol. 9, no. 3, 1983, p. 81.
98. A. Naiman, Word Processing Buyer’s Guide,
BYTE/McGraw-Hill, 1983, p. 177.
99. Ibid., p. 81.
100. C. Platt and D. Langford, Micromania: The Whole
Truth about Personal Computers, Sphere, 1984, p.
102. A. Naiman, Word Processing Buyer’s Guide, p. 91.
102. The first version of WordPerfect was called
SSI*WP, but was otherwise similar to the version
launched for the IBM/PC in 1982. Its origins are
explained in W.E. Peterson, Almost Perfect, Prima,
1994. For an early review of the product, see L.L.
Beavers, “WordPerfect: Not Quite Perfect, But
Certainly Superb,” Creative Computing, vol. 9, no.
11, 1983, p. 74. WordPerfect eventually support-
ed a broad range of platforms, including DEC
minicomputers and even IBM mainframes.
103. US Bureau of Labor Statistics, Occupational Out-
look Handbook, 2006-07 Edition: Data Entry and
Information Processing Workers, US Dept. Labor, 4
Aug. 2006; http://www.bls.gov/oco/ocos155.htm.
Thomas Haigh is an assistant
professor in the University of
Wisconsin—Milwaukee’s School
of Information Studies. He holds
BSc and MEng degrees in systems
integration from the University
of Manchester, UK, and a PhD in
the history and sociology of sci-
ence from the University of Pennsylvania. He has pub-
lished extensively on the history of computing, focusing
on the use and management of computers in large
organizations and on the history of software products
and technologies. Biographies department editor of
Annals, Haigh chairs the Special Interest Group on
Computers, Information and Society of the Society for
the History of Technology.
Readers may contact Thomas Haigh at thaigh@
computer.org; http://www.tomandmaria.com/tom.
For further information on this or any other com-
puting topic, please visit our Digital Library at http://
computer.org/publications/dlib.
October–December 2006

(+)
